


Shia's words felt caught up was surely not only because of her exhausted body.



Shia was obviously looking shocked from seeing the disastrous appearance of Tio.



Tio replied with a bright voice in order to reassure Shia.



"Yes. This is, every, one's, belo, ved, pervert, Tio, san he…gafuh…gehah"



"No no no, this is not the time for saying humor with a body that almost died like that! There is no person or anything that like Tio-san when you are in your pervert mode! All the mankind would only draw away in revulsion against such pervert desu! Wait not that, healing, quickly healing!"



"No, person, likes me…the whole mankind, will draw away…how, cruel. Gofuuu, haa haa."



While taking out magical medicine of healing from her own 'Treasure Warehouse II' all flustered, Shia was making a sharply piercing retort with a voice that was oozing with unease. Even while enduring a tremendous pain, Tio's tone was changing from feeling a bit of pleasure and she was going 'haa haa' in a different meaning. As expected, the pain given to her from her comrade felt sweet.



Shia was crawling toward Tio who was lying down spread-eagled in a tattered state, magical medicine in hand. But, before Shia could reach Tio, a silver feather flew in high speed and disintegrated the medicine container at Shia's hand.



Shia came to her sense and when she looked at the direction from where the feather was flying, there was Freed riding above Uranus there glaring at Shia without hiding the scorn in his expression.



When Shia looked above, there was a swarm of monsters there in which the expression of like the number of stars matched it perfectly. Her surrounding was also completely buried in monsters, she couldn't see the edge of the island at all. It was as though the ground was covered by undulating dark clouds.



Shia and Tio were surrounded completely in a hemisphere shape.



Because Shia had acted recklessly in her battle with the apostles, she was in a state where she couldn't immediately fight, as for Tio it should be rather left unsaid. She was heavily wounded to the degree that it was mysterious that she was still alive.



In other words, this is a situation of checkmate from all point of view.



"A power that could drive away the strengthened apostles of god is something to be feared…but it appeared you have completely used up your strength. It's already over for Tio Claus too. This is the end of the path of the fools who went against god. Obediently receive this judgment."



Shia directed a chilly gaze at Freed who haughtily proclaimed such. And then, when her mouth opened to talk back,



'Fuh, fuha, fuhahahahahah, gehah, kafu-, hahaha-"



Shia swallowed her words hearing Tio's laugh.



"…Have you lost even your mind? That's understandable. After all you should be tormented by unimaginable tremendous pain even now."



"No, no. Nothing, wrong, with mine sanity. What art funny, is, thy humor. Fufu."



Tio ghastly distorted her blood soaked face while directing a sharp gaze that was unthinkable coming from that wound-riddled body. Pierced by those golden eyes with slitted pupils that were increasing in radiance, Freed unconsciously took a step back.



The bad promotion that he felt before Tio got directly hit by the aurora swelled up further, a chill was circling in his whole body as though something unknown was crawling around.



But, he ignored the chill using his fury toward himself who was pressured by these two who were already at the death's door no matter he saw it, and he kept up with his haughty attitude.



"Hmph. What can you do this late with that kind of state? Do you think you can manage something somehow with the likes of the black dragons? Or else, don't tell me, are you thinking that your master would return here so conveniently?"



"Perish, the thought. Just that, the one, ending this, is me."



Tio's body was shining with black colored magic power light. Even though she was supposedly unable to move, her body was making creaking sound while she scolded her trembling legs to stand up. Without paying any mind to the blood that was dripping down, only her lips were showing a deepening fierce smile.



Freed put himself on guard.



He tried to deal the finishing blow judging that there was no need for any question. In concert with that, Uranus also opened its mouth wide. Light of annihilation was converging inside it.



And then, in that moment just before the last flash was going to be fired,



*DOKUN—!!*



Pulsing sound resounded in the space.



Not only that, a tremendous pressure that was even accompanied by physical impact rushed through the dome-shaped space, causing Freed and Uranus to slightly staggered. There were even monsters in the surrounding who fainted.



The center of that pressure was without doubt Tio.



Despite being just a step away from death, she was emitting an impossible pressure.



*DOKUN—!!*



Pulsing was spreading at the whole space once more.



The abnormal pressure was heightening second by second. It even caused a hallucination as though their heart was being grabbed tightly.



*DOKUN—!!*



The pulsation spread for the third time.



Whether one wanted it or not, they were made to understand this instinctually. That it was an existence that one must not lay their hands on.



What they felt was fear.



What was hard to believe, what he didn't want to believe, was that this swelling pulsation of power easily surpassed the white divine dragon that could be said as the culmination of Freed's effort.



(I, impossible. Just what in the world, something, something is happening-. Is she not actually dying? Is she bluffing? Something…something like this, it's as if, as if this is the same with that monster-)



With his body stiffening unable to be aware of his trembling arms and legs, Freed spouted out such words that were filled with confusion and agitation in his heart. But then he came back to his senses all of sudden when he noticed Tio who had stood up completely, she had pulled Shia close to her and gazed at Freed with narrowed eyes.



If he had the free time to be paralyzed, if he had the time to lament how unbelievable this was, then he should attack them with no question asked instead. Even with the situation turning bizarre like this, it didn't change that Tio and Shia were in exhaustion, it would be enough if he attacked simultaneously along with the surrounding monsters. Freed was feeling anger at his own stupidity after this late like that.



With that fury, Freed who was scolding himself raised up his arm.



"Tsk, attack-! Don't let them do anything-! Kill them right now-!!!"



A command that sounded like a shriek.



All the terrified monsters couldn't immediately react. Be that as it may, the monsters that were in the number that was far more than enough to destroy just two people obeyed that command, including the Uranus they let out their killing intent.



There, a voice resounded.



The voice that possessed a solemn echo sounded like it was descending from the sky despite how the speaker was right there in front of them.



"Observe closely. This is the zenith that I, the dragon race Tio Claus had arrived at."



Right after that, a storm of killing intent was released.



At the center of that was naturally the aurora breath of Uranus.



But, all those attacks couldn't hope to wound Shia and Tio.



If the reason was asked, it was because just before the attacks were launched, an extremely large flash surged and pierced the sky with Tio as the center.



Black――or rather the dark light that was like the abyss was rising straight to the sky, the monsters standing on its way were all blown away.



Although attacks were rushing at that flash's bottom, the place where Tio and Shia were at, the dark light pillar rising to the sky while rumbling the space didn't shake even a bit.



Far from that, it increased in radiance even further while still piercing the sky, in addition black ripple was spreading in the sky.



"What is, what is happening-!"



Freed yelled with even his confusion exposed.



Even while he was doing that, the dark ripple was spreading through the sky――



At the next moment, a flame blast licked all over the sky.



The radiant great fire was spreading crawlingly and in the blink of eye the sky was dyed red. What was manifested wasn't sea of clouds but a sea of flame. The red sea that was blazing roaringly couldn't be thought as the scenery of this world by any means.



Further in that flame sea of the sky, lightning surged.



Divine rumbling sound roared, not losing to the sound of the air bursting. The raining down thunders were randomly, carelessly, mercilessly, shooting out the monsters and exterminated them like scattering flies.



At that time, in the sea of flame and lightning, something undulated.



A black and shining twisting large body. The whole of that body couldn't be seen yet, it was unclear just how big it was, a part of its body was jutting out from the sea of flame and thunder before sinking in again. It was just like how the divine beast leviathan was lurking in the sea, however, the aberrant pressure pouring down on the ground was far mightier.



"What, wha-what, is that…"



Freed was staring at the sky in a daze while whispering. All the monsters including the white divine dragon were also at the same state. All the monsters were similarly kept staring at the red sky in a daze.



There was no way that whisper would be answered. But, just when they were thinking like that, in that timing the thing swimming in the sea of lightning and flame displayed the whole of its true form.



Along with a tremendous roar.



GOAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA!!!



The sky fell.



The enormously tremendous roar that made the listener hallucinate that rained down from the sky in super wide range.



Due to that, the monsters who had difficulty in their defensive power were easily pulverized, while a lot of other monsters had their consciousness reaped and they fell on the ground.



Amidst that, what showed its figure was a gigantic dragon covered in dragon scale that shined black with its body clad in flame and lightning. It wasn't a western dragon that imitated a lizard. It was an eastern dragon with a long meandering body like a snake. The whole length of its body might be more than a hundred meter.



Black dragon――no, if the white dragon was called as a white divine dragon, then the true form of this dragon that should be called as a black divine dragon, went without saying, it was the form of that person Tio Claus.



Soul and metamorphosis composite magic 'Dragon God Manifestation'――using soul magic 'Magic Clad Alignment' that aligned the soul with magic so that the body could wear the magic itself with the highest class flame magic 'World Destroyer Flame Wave' and the highest class wind magic 'Sky Miracle', and then adding to those the metamorphosis magic 'Sixth Heaven's Demon Transformation', secret medicine to strengthen the body, sublimation magic, and then, the 'Pain Conversion II' that was the derivative skill of characteristic magic 'Dragonification', only after using all of those at the same time this ultimate skill of Tio could be activated.



Tio was reducing the side effect of the aurora that was too strong while doing damage control. Even while doing that she was piling up the necessary strength for dragon god transformation using 'Pain Conversion II' by continuously bearing wounds.



She had received that much damage while healing herself to the degree that she wouldn't die, even so, if at the very end she didn't bear that heavy wound that brought her to the verge of death, she wouldn't be able to pile up the strength for the dragon god transformation. In addition, she was unable to stock up energy by hurting herself, on top of that the damage couldn't be changed into pleasure in the middle of the conversion, and then there was even the side effect of her sense of pain getting magnified. If someone with average mental strength attempted this, they would be driven mad assuredly before they could activate the dragon god transformation.



Originally Tio planned to take care of Freed with only her black dragons, and then she would rush toward Hajime's position with a strength that was still heightened to maximum before unveiling this technique in the battle against Ehito but…



In the present situation where she forced herself to activate this technique, she might only have a minute to maintain this form. And then, after her dragon god transformation was released, she would surely become the same like Shia where she would be in a state where she couldn't fight.



Therefore



(I'll finish everything in this one minute!)



The golden eyes of Tio who accomplished dragon god transformation glared fiercely at the monsters below.



The monsters immediately drew back in fear. Only one, the white divine dragon who wasn't drawing back, but in its eyes there was a fear and awe that couldn't be hidden.



Tio's roar thundered.



Right after that, many gigantic lightning surged from the sea of flame and lightning and mercilessly cooked the monsters swarm. If this scale was measured using the earth measurement then the scale could far surpass a level F5 storm. The monsters who tried to escape were all rolled up and embraced into blazing arms, they were annihilated there leaving not even dust behind.



"Impossible-, impossible-, impossible-, impossible-, impossible-, impossible-, impossible-, impossible-, impossible-! This, something like this is impossible-,! There is no way this is possible-!"



The thunders raining down from the sky was like a divine punishment. The tornado connecting the land and sky and swallowed everything into ruin was like the fire of hell.



Seeing that scene that should be called as the manifestation of heaven's might, Freed felt like the divinity of the god that he held faith to was denied along with his faith, he was repeating words that denied reality in half-madness.



And then, he gave an order to the divine white dragon that was his best masterpiece.



"Deny that, Uranus! That, that existence, DENYYYYYY IIIIIIIIITTT!!"



GuUU, RUAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA—!!



Uranus answered its master's command.



It opened its jaw and fired the strongest aurora it could as though to blow away his fear altogether, as though to grant its master's wish.



However, that attack which was fired with its whole body and soul――



GOAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA—!!



The flash of darkness clad in sparks that was fired from the jaw of the divine black dragon Tio collided against the aurora midair. A beat later, the aurora was easily pushed back and the flash of darkness swallowed Uranus without stopping.



There wasn't even a shriek of death agony.



The flash of black that erased even sound merely tore up the sky, gouged the ground, and without slowing down it annihilated a part of the floating island before vanishing at the space below.



No, the white divine dragon wasn't completely annihilated.



Its lower body was blown away, its body that consisted mostly only of chest and head fell on the ground with a bam. Its dignity as a divine dragon had already gone without even a fragment remaining. Light was quietly falling off from its eyes, reducing the flesh into a mere husk.



"U, ra…nus?"



Freed stared at the white divine dragon with powerless voice.



That figure that didn't respond even when he called made an indescribable emotion to well up in his heart.



The processing of information in his brain couldn't catch up with what was happening.



Even though he was floating in midair, it felt like his feet was swaying unstably.



When Freed noticed, he was screaming.



"AAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA-!!"



Giving only a glance at the millions of monsters who were exterminated with preposterous momentum, Freed glared straight at Tio and flapped his silver wings. In those eyes things like monsters or anything else weren't reflected anymore, there was only flame of fury and hatred blazing there.



He fired silver flash with all his strength. He fired shockwave of space magic and tore apart the space.



But, all of those were easily dispersed just with Tio's roar.



He couldn't reach.



He couldn't reach toward Tio who had climbed to far away height.



That was why,



"Gahah!?"



The shockwave of the roar that Tio raised――Freed was driven away just from the after wave from that.



Freed whose whole body was struck hard and stiffened as though he was paralyzed was then assaulted by falling thunder. *KA-!* The sky flashed and then at the next instant, a tremendous impact pierced his body, Freed was falling to the ground while white smoke was raising from his body.



His body struck the ground, and then after he bounced several times on the surface, he finally stopped and laid down spread-eagled.



In the eyes of Freed that were looking above at the sky, the scene where the monsters in the number that covered the whole space to the brim had been reduced to a degree where they could be counted by a glance was reflected. Whether he wanted it or not, he was made to understand that this was the end.



His violent emotions already disappeared, right now for some reason only emptiness was smoldering in him.



What is someone like me who was welcomed by god doing, giving up like this. I should resolve myself instead to walk the path of martyrdom to take the enemy together with me into death until the very end.



Even when he tried to persuade himself like that, as expected, his body didn't even twitch. His body was unable to move because of the damage…not. The will power to move his body, just wasn't welling up in his heart.



"I…"



At that time when Freed was about to whisper something, a black light fell from the sky toward him.



His awfully calm mind judged that it was a finishing blow for him. With this, it was the end for him.



But, at that moment, a shadow passed over the firing line of the black light.



KURYAAAAAAAAAAAAAA–!!



"Wha-!?"



Something roared and cut into the firing line, and with its body that something became Freed's shield, it was…



"Uranus-!!"



Yes, it was the white divine dragon that should have already expired.



With its body that now consisted only of its upper body, Uranus somehow moved and leaped in front of the dark flash.



The white divine dragon whose body was in tatters from the edge slightly turned at Freed who was opening his eyes in shock while narrowing its eyes quietly.



He couldn't hear any words even if he used metamorphosis magic.



Nevertheless, at that time, Freed was able to clearly understand what the white divine dragon was conveying to him.



Namely,



"Run away, huh…"



While making aurora to gush out from its remaining broken body, unbelievably Uranus was holding back Tio's flash――that will, it was the will to not let its master Freed to die.



At that moment, a torrent of memory rushed Freed.



He recalled. At the time when he was nothing more but a mere devil race, why at that time he was attempting to challenge a great labyrinth.



(…I was merely, wishing to make a safe country, where nothing could threaten my brethrens. I pursued power for the sake of that. My brethrens were more important than anything. I thought that if it was for their sake then I could do anything. Yet despite so…'It can't be helped because it's the will of god', huh…)



The white divine dragon was pressuring on him.



It was directing a criticizing gaze toward its master that wasn't trying to run.



But, toward that white divine dragon, Freed only shook his head quietly and made a troubled smile.



He challenged a great labyrinth with mad desperation, actually he even almost died many times before obtaining the metamorphosis magic. And then with that magic this dragon monster was the first monster that he subdued. Since then this dragon had been his partner for all this time.



Even though it should have been dead for sure, yet it crossed over logic and rushed to him when he was in danger. He felt a definite bond in that act. Even though he himself had already forgotten even such an important thing before he knew it, his partner didn't forget that even now when it was already dead.



Freed's body was worn-out, he was already unable to move satisfactorily.



Then,



"…Sorry. Go together with me, partner."



――Kurya



That voice sounded as though it was saying "Can't be helped huh".



At the next moment, the dark flash swallowed everything like a divine punishment――



After that, there was nothing left behind.



(If thou two weren't charmed by that god…thou would be a good pair of master and servant, no, a good partners with certainty. But, thou were unable to resist or persist, art because of thy weakness in the end. Thou could make no excuse. Well, at the very least, this Tio Claus will remember the conclusion of the two of thou.)



Tio turned a solemn gaze fitting for a dragon god to the spot where Freed and Uranus were at.



That way of ending that Freed and Uranus showed at the very end, where they smiled wryly at each other holding a saturation of various emotions, for Tio it was something that for some reason she didn't want to cast away as something trivial.



But, at that time, Shia's voice resounded.



{Ti, Tio-saaaan. Won't the time come any time nowww?}



Shia's voice that reached Tio through telepathy came from inside the body of Tio that transformed into dragon god. So that she wouldn't get dragged in, Tio sheltered Shia inside her body where it was the safest place. It was essentially the same like when she stored away her equipment when she turned into a dragon. Her body was longer than a hundred meters anyway so there was no problem for her to shelter Shia inside there.



{Yes. It's frustrating but, mine limit will come soon. Let's annihilate them all in one go!}



The time limit of the dragon god transformation.



Along with a terrific roar, a flash that dyed the world black rushed through the space. Thunders were becoming fiercer and fiercer and gigantic tornados of flame trampled the monsters to ashes.



And then,



{Kuu, thi, this is the limit.}



At the same time with Tio's pained voice, the sea of flame and thunder covering the sky dispersed and the tornado became undone gently. There was almost no monster that could be seen. Even if there were monsters that survived they would be wounded all over or ran away at full speed already fearing Tio's majestic appearance.



Right after that, the body of the black divine dragon went *KAT!* as though light exploded, then that large body vanished like a lie and Shia and Tio appeared at the midair.



As only natural, they lost against gravity and fell.



"Wait, Tio-saaan! This is midair desuu!"



"Ah, oops. I hath no spare energy. Shia, give me help."



"Are you stupid-. Even I don't have any spare energy anymore!"



They looked like they still had the composure to complain at each other, but in actuality they couldn't even use 'Air Force' or body strengthening, far from that they didn't even have magic power remaining to activate 'Treasure Warehouse II', so this wasn't quite a laughing matter for them.



"Hiiiii! Even though we have won with great pain, yet we are going to die like this in the end, I don't wanna desuu!"



"I, it's fine! Black dragooonnn, heeelp uuussss"



Tio called the black dragons. Shia felt relieved noticing that they still had this method.



However, the voice of the black dragons that responded to Tio's call sounded extremely far.



"Aa, that's right. Because it was dangerous I made them to evacuate quite far. Perhaps they won't make it in time…"



"Noooooooooo!! Hajime-saaaaan!!"



Shia started crying. While Tio was plainly flustered.



But, at that time, a white shadow rushed toward the two in super speed like a streak of flash.



And then, the arms of the two were firmly caught by rabbit ears, the catcher then kicked on the air and reduced its speed.



That was,



"Inaba!?"



"Is it Inaba!?"



"Kyuu!"



Yes, it was the kick rabbit Inaba-san.



Inaba was kicking on the air while gradually lowering their altitude, he then safely lowered Shia and Tio on the ground.



"Thou saved us. My gratitude to thou, Inaba."



"Inaba, thank you very much. But, why are you here…"



"Kyukyuu! Kyuu?"



Inaba brushed off his rabbit ear with a swish as though to say don't mind it. And then in exchange for answering Shia's question, Inaba stiffened his ear at a certain direction.



When they looked there, there were the figures of Shizuku and others at far away waving their hands energetically at them while coming to their spot riding their skyboard.



Shizuku and others who closed the distance in the blink of eye landed down beside Shia and Tio.



"I'm glad that the two of you are safe. Looks like it was dangerous just now isn't it."



"I wondered what was going on when Inaba-san leaped forward, but really it's great that the two of you are safe."



"Ou, looks like you two got really messed up huh."



"Haha…it was like looking at a myth happening just now. …Really, I'm glad that Shizuku and others stopped me…"



Shizuku and Suzu approached Shia and TIo who was lying down dead tired and made them drank magic medicine and put healing magic on them. Ryutaro was looking around at some of the floating islands that looked like they were going to crumble anytime with an astonished expression. Kouki was cursing "Are you idiot huh!?" and punching with his all the him in the past who acted hostilely at Shia and others while offering thought of gratitude at Shizuku and others once more.



"Shizuku-san and others too, you are all safe. Besides, it appeared that the idiot-san also seems to be reflecting. That's great desu."



Shia's words made Kouki groaned "uu".



"But, as for the other one…no, I doth not say anything. Everyone, thou all has worked hard."



Tio was looking at Suzu with a bit of consideration, but as for the aforementioned Suzu, she was smiling with a clear gaze like a different person compared to before they parted, so Tio didn't convey any word of consolation and merely gifted them words of praise. Toward that, Suzu's smile turned even stronger.



"Nevertheless this is shocking. When we discovered the entrance that connected the spaces and tried to jump into it…"



"Sea of fire, tornado of flame, countless monsters, and then there was even a jumbo dragon exactly like in a myth. I already resigned myself for a bit there. The scenery made me wanted to make a U-turn because we mistook the room."



Shizuku and Suzu turned their gaze at Tio.



It appeared Shizuku and others arrived at this space just when Tio was doing her dragon god transformation. The first scene that they saw right after crossing the space was an Armageddon…there was no doubt that their eyes at that time were flying out of their eye socket in shock just like in manga picture.



"Well, because that was mine trump card after all. Originally I wished to rush at Goshujin-sama's side in the state of dragon god transformation but…that was a wish that was too high to achieve. Rather than that, all of thee hath caught up to us really quickly isn't it? Even though thou hath no compass like us."



"We weren't really lost you know? After the clock tower got smashed, it took us a bit of time to search the other city but, when we discovered another entrance and used it, we arrived directly to here."



"Hmm. As for us, from that ruined city there were several spaces that interposed between us until this space but…perhaps with the destruction of the clock tower, the arrangement of the connected space changed then. After all the compass should have displayed to us the shortest route."



Possibly this might be the harassment from Ehitorujue. Tio thought about Hajime who went ahead and she sent a bit worried gaze at empty air.



The expression of Shizuku who guessed that Hajime wasn't here as expected from Tio's expression turned similarly worried and then she inquired about what happened.



Like that they listened to the rough gist of what happened from Shia and Tio, and then all of them nodded at each other in agreement to chase after Hajime in this case, it was at that time,



GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO GO —-



The space began to rumble.



Shia and others put up their guard at the surrounding wondering what was going on.



Ahead of the gazes of them, *bari-*, *biki-*, the space itself was cracking. It was as though the space was going to crumble.



Right after that, the floating island where Shia and others were at that was already greatly damaged became unable to endure the vibration that attacked the space and large fissures ran through the ground, a beat later, the island crumbled grandly.



In panic, they boarded their skyboard and evacuate to sky.



"Tha, that is…is that by any chance, the surface?"



Suzu was pointing at below while raising her voice.



The floating island was breaking. The space beneath it was wavering, from there they could see a ground at far below. The scenery there where there was a fortress and grass plain was also one that they were familiar with, and then a great number of people were clamoring there in that image.



Perhaps because the space was unstable, that scenery immediately disappeared and returned back to usual. But, the eerie rumbling was still not stopping, the spots of space where there was wavering faintly displayed places that they had visited before and also places they didn't know before vanishing once more.



"…Surely this is because of Hajime-san desu. Hajime-san is fighting Ehito desu!"



"That's right. This place art Holy Precincts. Then this place should be the place that is most affected by the god Ehito. For the space to become unstable might mean that this is just how much Ehito art being cornered."



It was merely a hypothesis.



But, it was a hypothesis that they could believe because if it was Hajime then it was possible.



"Then, we too have to hurry then."



"Yoosh, let's get out from this place that might collapse anytime and link up with Nagumo-kun immediately."



Everyone nodded to Shizuku and Suzu's words.



And then, they headed toward the obelisk at the center floating island that was still barely floating.



Shia who was still staggering with her shoulder was supported by Shizuku with her shoulder while she touched her hand at the obelisk without hesitation.



"?"



However, nothing happened. When Hajime used his compass, there was no doubt that it was pointing at this obelisk, so there was no mistake that this was the entrance.



Shia touched the obelisk one more time, but as expected nothing happened.



"Why!?"



Shia who became desperate touched again, but no matter how many times she repeated the obelisk wasn't reacting.



"Perhaps this art related with this unstable space. If I remember correctly, there art also obelisk at the other floating islands correct? Let's try using those."



Following Tio's consideration, they headed toward the other obelisk.



…However, that obelisk was also not reacting.



And, at that time, the space shook once more.



And then, this time the space began to crumble from the edge.



Shizuku who got a bad premonition went toward the boundary where the place was beginning to crumble and threw a rock as a test. Her premonition was spot on. The thrown rock crumbled as though it was disintegrated and vanished without even leaving dust behind.



"A bad, situation is it…"



Tio's grim voice rang awfully clearly.



"Even if we get swallowed by the crumbling we are going to be safe…something like that would be just too convenient isn't it."



"What about the obelisk that we used to enter into this space I wonder?"



Following Suzu's proposal, they headed toward that place in a hurry. The crumbling was advancing rapidly. They understood that the space was shrinking down as though a cage was getting smaller little by little. Right now, even in this moment the floating islands that were caught by the crumbling were vanishing into dust starting from their edge.



"No way…we cannot even go back."



Kouki murmured with a sorrowful face.



The obelisk that Kouki and others came out from into this place also didn't react.



The crumbling was approaching.



They returned to the center floating island in hurry, but the crumbling was accelerating with increasing momentum. It seemed that even another space that they could see from the swaying space also didn't escape from the crumbling. Even the world of the ruined city was vanishing from its edges.



"Is this…as far as we can go?"



Kouki murmured.



Shizuku and others gritted their teeth hearing those words.



"Hajime-san, Yue-san…"



With a strong gaze, Shia was staring at an empty space as though she was looking far away while calling the name of the two of her beloved.



Finally the crumbling was also starting to erode the center floating island.



They desperately wracked their brain. They wouldn't stop struggling until the end.



Like that, rather than waiting for death





Chapter 172




All credit goes to the original author (Chuuni Suki), who has posted the raw data here:



Thanks for your continued support. If you like my writing style, check out my original works at , or just leave a comment.



Bakapervert translated this chapter. Bakapervert did the edits.



____________________________________



Mankind's Struggle (First Part)



Turning back the time a bit.



The surface of the world was completely changed by the erosion of dark red color that looked like the eyes of a monster. And then, a crack of space that exposed the abyss appeared at the sky of such bizarre world.



After Hajime and others safely jumped into that crack of space which scattered muddy black miasma――the gate that connected toward Holy Precincts, the apostles of god that swarmed that place turned on their heel still with an expressionless face.



What was reflected in the inhuman eyes looking down from the great height, was the crowd of people who displayed their insolence by trying to oppose god's will.



" " " " "Judgment of god." " " " "



Those words were murmured in one voice.



If the people at the ground heard those words, surely they would object "There is not even a speck of reason for us to be judged!" with a loud voice.



But, the puppets of god that wouldn't even lend any ear to that objection swung their twin large swords once, then they flapped their wings and began to descend all at once. They only revised their orbit using their silver wings. Next, the large number of apostles rapidly approached toward the allied force mostly by freefalling while leaving a silver trail behind like a swarm of meteors.



Thinking of the apostles' spec, in this battlefield where bug character like Hajime and others were gone, there was no existence that could possibly stop these women. Even if there were a lot of people in possession of item like the artifacts that could launch flash(Anti-Material Rifle) which covered the penetration of Hajime and others into Holy Precincts, but there was no reason that mere 'human' could hope to match them.



Therefore, for the apostles what would be starting from here on wouldn't a battle, it would be a curbstomp without any doubt, just a light work like mowing down grass.



…was what they thought how it was supposed to be.



That thought only continued until their whole field of vision was buried in barrages of bullets.



"Attackkk!! No need for even a drop of mercy or reservation-! Pound away with the intention of using up all your ammooo!!"



An amplified command resounded among the allied force, at the same time bullets barrage were fired without pause from the whole allied force soldiers.



Every single soldier aimed rifle gun toward the sky and pulled the trigger, each time the trigger was pulled the internal mineral that had been enchanted with 'Lightning Clad' electromagnetically accelerated the pseudo-full metal jacket bullet and fired it.



The all out firing from all the rifle guns that had been distributed to all the soldiers of allied force became several millions of flashes just for the first wave attack that pierced the sky.



Furthermore, the large gatling railguns that were fixed at the fortress and trenches completely blanketed the sky with flashes simultaneously. The number of the gatling railguns in total was a thousand. A thousand of the monstrous railguns with twelve thousand shots per minute roared simultaneously.



That wasn't all.



In addition, a thousand stationary large Orkan released a few hundred missiles loaded inside them almost at the same time. The spectacle of orange fire trail rushing to the sky all at once could be described as a masterpiece.



Regarding the weapons, the people with fast understanding were given priority to be a shooter, they had practiced handling the weapon until the last minute, so the weapons that were the hybrid of top of the line modern weapon and alternate world fantasy could muster their fury without taking too much time. The characteristic advantage of modern weapon where 'it wasn't influenced by the skill of the individual' was exhibited in ample here.



In an instant, the sky was completely covered by swarms of flashes and missiles, they easily swallowed the apostles who kept descending down.



The swarms of railguns that already should be called as a wall mercilessly gouged out the apostles, opening wind holes in their body one after another, the swarms of missiles grandly scattered flame blast and shockwave everywhere and bloomed crimson lotus in the sky. The apostles that got dragged into that blooming were toyed around inside the storm of explosions and their body burst and scattered.



However, even though the first wave of the apostles got easily killed because they let their guard down, the enemy over there was the apostle of god. They immediately put their guard up, weaved through the barrage, slashed away the flashes, or used their silver wings for defense and forcefully broke through to approach their enemy.



"Naïve."



The one who was lifting the corner of his lips in fearless smirk was the sniper of Hauria race who played a very active role when Hajime and others stormed the Holy Precincts. It was 'Bardfeld of Certain Death', ten years old.



Across the scope that was enchanted with 'Foresight' which displayed the future position of the enemy as a phantom image, he stared at an apostle that slipped through a flame blast and naturally pulled the trigger with quiet breathing.



Immediately, a cannon shot that was specialized for penetration similar with Schlagen became a flash, with a superb timing it attacked the apostle who was going to move to attack right now, the flash then cleanly blown up her head.



Scenes similar with that were also accomplished here and there by the grand flashes that were fired from everywhere in the fortress and trenches. This feat was achieved by the sniper team that was fully equipped with the improved version of Schlagen.



Perhaps judging that such snipers were a danger, the apostles followed the line of fire and directed their gazes toward the snipers that included 'Bardfeld of Certain Death' and they flew out all at once at them…



This time, it was the golem soldiers who were standing by at the back of the snipers, with gatling cannons in both hands and missile pods equipped on their shoulders, they began simultaneous strafing fire to protect the snipers.



"――"



The apostles gulped and attempted to evade.



But it was too slow. At this point of time, the snipers were already catching the prey across the scope. Faster than even their mind, their finger leaned on the trigger and quietly pulled. It was as though their body had known the best timing.



The result was just a matter of course. The sky was decorated with blooming crimson flowers once more.



Even though this was supposed to be an easy work that was equal with a mere slaughter, even though the monsters were supposed to be already gone from this place, for some reason it was only the apostles who got killed one-sidedly. Weren't they the apostle of god? Weren't they standing at far away height that human couldn't possibly arrive at, created by the supreme existence as the greatest fighting strength?



The apostles naturally narrowed their gaze.



"Know how futile your resistance is."



One of the apostles whispered.



Right after that, they stopped descending and rained down silver bombardments all at once from long range toward the ground.



It was a silver colored squall.



It was a really beautiful and fantastical spectacle, but the tragic result this local heavy rain would bring about was the very definition of atrocity itself.



Some part of this was offset by the barrages of bullet, but the bombardment that came from apostles whose body was clad with silver magic power in strengthened state slipped through the barrages mostly intact and approached the ground.



…And then,



"Great Barrier start up!"



It was held back above the allied force.



The improved great barrier that was activated following the command of the commander Liliana, blocked the meteor shower of death.



Against the silver flash that possessed disintegration ability, even if it was the great barrier that was an age of god artifact that had protected the capital of the kingdom for many years, originally the best it could do would be to hold on for a few moments. But, right now the great barrier that had been applied with Hajime's improvement was spreading in rainbow ripple and firmly protected the allied force.



The great barrier that originally was deployed in three layers with the strength of each layer depending on proportion with the range was now focused into a single layer which increased its toughness. Naturally, it was also strengthened using sublimation magic. By no means it could perfectly oppose the disintegration ability, but it was capable enough to make the apostles to spend some time breaking through.



And then, the time that was bought from that was for the sake of showing the next hand to recover from the hopeless situation.



The blow from the first barrage was merely a surprise attack against the arrogant apostles. With these women who literally had specs that were in a different league compared to human as the opponent, they would surely adapt after the first attack. Therefore, the humans had to carry out the plan so they could fight the apostles.



That plan was,



"To the choir squad. Please give the fall toward the puppets who proclaimed themselves as angel!"



The order of Liliana that was amplified in sound resounded in the battlefield.



The target of that command was the people who looked like clergyman that gathered at the rooftop of the fortress, there were even women and children included among them.



With a solemn atmosphere that didn't suit the battlefield, everyone put their hands together in front of their chest with uniform movement, taking a praying pose. All of them were the clergymen of the church who spread the teaching of the holy church in the remote region, that was to say they were the remains of the holy church. They were people who had separated from the central church, or possibly they had too much of pure faith that they were driven away from central as troublesome people.



Those people who were in a sense were the true clergymen followed the direction of an aging man clad in priest clothing standing in front of them, then they opened their mouths slowly.



" " " " " " " " " "――――♪" " " " " " " " " "



A melody resounded.



It was a holy song. A song that blessed the people and condemned the people that trampled on peace and love. A solemn melody of sacred protection and judgment.



A magic circle was floating beneath the choir. Through the crystals that were put here and there on it, the power of the holy song itself was amplified to terrific level.



That song which pushed through the explosive and thunderous sounds of the weapons and resounded throughout the battlefield naturally reached the ears of the apostles who were launching all-out bombardment to break the great barrier.



Immediately,



"――, this is, my strength-"



One of the apostles leaked out a surprised voice.



That was surely something that couldn't be helped for her. After all, the proof of strengthening that was the silver light which enveloped her body had dispersed, in exchange there was crimson light coiling around her before she felt her strength leaving her body like water that flowed out from a container with opened cork.



Once the pope Ishtar invoked this magic――'Holy Song of Supreme Degeneration' toward Hajime who was facing the apostle Nointo at the sky above the God Mountain. It was a brutal magic that combined the effects of obstructing the target's movement and weakened their strength as long as the song was resounding.



Now this song had its effect amplified using sublimation magic, in addition, it was also enchanted with the words of power that stopped the body function of Kaori and did her in before, Hajime reproduced the effect using soul magic and enchanted it through the medium of crystal pillars.



As expected, driving the apostles until they went out of service or completely weakening them were impossible, but the song was still able to obstruct the strengthened state of the apostles, in addition, it also could drop the specs of the apostles until nearly sixty percent of their original specs.



"Tsk, eliminating."



The gazes of the apostles were directed at the choir which was the source of their abnormality. They planned to prioritize eliminating the choir.



Several of the apostles formed a group and they began to lift their large swords simultaneously. Right after that, their magic power was focused and formed a swelling silver sun.



Although only a bit of time had passed, but the great barrier was already screaming from receiving disintegration ability from countless apostles. If it got hit by the focused silver bombardment, it would surely become unable to endure this time and got smashed.



"But, that too is within expectation. Please prioritize the apostles whose movements are stopping!"



Liliana's command resounded for the third time. That command was conveyed to all leaders of each squad, then they further gave that instruction to the subordinates under them to prioritize targeting the apostles who were concentrating in the focused bombardment.



The swarm of fire lines reached out from the ground toward the sky, the thickness of this wave was by no means diluted. It wasn't diluting at all. The people with high shooting ability obeyed the command and sniped at the unmoving apostles simultaneously.



The apostles who weren't involved with the focused bombardment defended against this attack. Using their twin large swords, their silver wings, feathers, they intercepted the attack. However, with their specs that had been forcefully lowered down and the crimson light that was coiling around their body and hindered their movement, so they were unable to deal with surging waves of the excessively mighty attacks which weren't depending on the user's specs.



One apostle, and then one more apostle, the apostle who were supposed to be absolute strong person were slaughtered with wind holes opened all over their body.



"Irregular-, even when you are not here you are still making a nuisance against us-"



The crimson light was coiling around the apostles mockingly. That was the radiance of the monster who had driven them away many times over. Seeing that light, the voice of the apostles who proclaimed that they were without emotion or anything turned a bit rough. They vaguely visualized in their mind a white-haired and eye-patched young man giving them a middle finger with a fearless grin.



However, it didn't mean that the allied force was able to shoot down all the apostles, finally the focusing finished and the light of devastation was emitted from the silver sun.



*GOU!* The atmosphere shook, the silver bombardment that was the result of the focus of fifty apostles hit the great barrier.



The rainbow ripple undulated fiercely, *biki biki* with cracking sounds cracks entered the great barrier.



"You guuys, put your spirit in iit!"



Such angry yell resounded at a corner of the fortress where the artifact of the great barrier was positioned. That was the angry voice of Wolpen who was the chief transmutation master of the kingdom. The artifact whose cracking was spreading due to the severe burden was repaired in real time using transmutation by the craftsmen led by Wolpen. Their hands were equipped with fingerless gloves that raised their transmutation ability. It was a romance glove that was a quality product of Hajime.



"Chief-, it's impossible already-! It cannot hold out!"



"Chih, can't be helped then. Abandon the great barrier! After activating the small scale barrier, we are going to concentrate at multiple barriers for the choir!"



" " " " "ROGER-" " " " "



After the great barrier was smashed, Wolpen and others activated the small scale barrier that defended temporarily against the bombardment that might pierce through, like that they ran around busily. They abandoned the barrier that protected the allied force and poured all their strength to the barrier artifact that focused on protecting the choir.



The moment they abandoned the transmutation for repairing in real-time, the cracks on the cylinder artifact spread all at once, and then a beat later the sound of pulverizing was echoing while small pieces flew everywhere.



That sound of pulverizing also resounded from the rainbow great barrier outside the fortress.



Similar like what was once seen at the kingdom capital, sparkling fragments were scattering and vanishing.



The apostles flapped their silver wings and flew in all at once. Their target was apparent at a glance. It was the choir that shaved off their specs until sixty percent.



Right now the rooftop where the choir was located at was enveloped by a multi-layered rainbow barrier that looked like the great barrier. By compressing the barrier into small scale and making it multi-layered, on the whole it had a hardness that surpassed the great barrier. But, if it was aimed by concentrated attacks then it would be surely got smashed through in less than a few minutes.



"Uu, aAAAAAAAA-!!"



One of the holy knights that was placed outside the barrier as protection for the choir raised a war cry and brandished his sword. He shook off his body that was naturally paralyzed from the majestic appearance of the approaching apostles by screaming.



"A nuisance."



The knight's torso was easily cut by the large sword that was slashed horizontally and he got blown away.



Yes, the knight wasn't bisected, he was blown away. In addition, there was a strange numbness in the arm that the apostle swung.



That fact made the apostles unconsciously stopped moving. With the attack of the large sword that was enchanted with disintegration ability, then even though they could only use forty percent of their strength it should be easy to bisect a single human into two. Despite so, she was unable to do that.



"HAAAAAAAAA-!!"



"-"



From the back of the apostle whose movement stopped because of the mysterious phenomenon, a new knight launched a vertical splitting attack from above along with a loud scream that had not even a speck of hesitation. The apostle didn't even use her large sword and blocked the attack with her wing, but not only the attack opposed her disintegration ability, it even made unpleasant sound *giiiiiiiiii* resounding before the knight sword sunk in. The apostle gazed to that in astonishment.



There, a scolding flew from that knight.



"Don't falter! We are a knight. Protecting is exactly our duty! Protect this place!"



"Captain David…guh, forgive me. Let me assist-"



The knight that was previously blown away stood up even while coughing away, a scratch in a straight line was left on his armor. He then slashed at the apostle with fierce momentum.



It was as though that became the signal, the knights――the former holy church's sacred knights that were led by the Aiko protection squad captain, David, the 'Goddess's Knights (self-proclaimed)' faced the flying apostles one after another.



And then, using their bastard swords that raised high-pitched sound while looking misty, the gauntlets that brought about the effect of 'Strong Arm' just by putting them on, and the leg armors that similarly granted the effect of 'Strong Leg', they assaulted the apostles while barely enduring the attacks of the apostles. Even if they were damaged by the attack that they couldn't endure, their armor somehow protected them from great harm.



"…Don't tell me, all of this strength come from artifacts?"



One of the apostles murmured.



David and everybody else, the knights, they were all equipped similarly with a bastard sword, gauntlets, and also black armor and simple helmet.



Black armor――this artifact was enchanted with 'Vajra' that was continuously active and 'Impact Conversion' that activated the moment attack touched the armor. Even the knight that got hit by an apostle's attack managed to pull through somehow with this.



And then the bastard sword was the so-called 'High-Speed Vibration Sword', just the sword itself possessed a considerable sharpness, on top of that it could release high-speed vibration using magic power, causing it to be able to disperse the disintegration ability even if only to a certain degree. And then, the helmet was enchanted with 'Light Speed', it was a degraded version but it was attached with the function to expand the user's perception.



All those equipment were basically a set and they were distributed to all the soldiers. In addition, before the battle began cheatmates were distributed so the specs of all the soldiers were also raised.



The plan was to weaken the apostles while at the same time making every single one of the allied force soldiers into a superhuman. As the result, the knights were able to oppose the apostles barely.



Even so, that was as far as it went, in the end they needed a group just to attack a single apostle before they could finally match the apostle.



At present even now the apostle that David slashed at was blowing away the other knights and repelled the vibration sword of David.



"Kuh――"



The apostle swung down her large sword toward David who was clenching his teeth due to his unrecoverable posture.



At that moment,



"First one."



"Eh?"



It was unclear whether that amazed voice was leaked by David or by the head of the apostle that was rotating in the air…



Like a joke, the head of the apostle flew casually and left behind its body. A beat later, *busha―!* amidst the blood spray that spurted grandly, that guy was there before anyone noticed.



It was a man with his body wrapped in black clothing that covered everything until his lips, a one lens type sunglass on his eyes, thin and sharp short sword――a kodachi held in reverse grip in his hand. On his head, fluffy rabbit ears were fluttering.



"The color of your blood is filthy, just like this dark red world…"



The man swung his kodachi sharply to swipe away the blood clotting it while pushing his sunglasses using his middle finger, then his lips suddenly distorted in nihility (it was unseen because of the mask though). However, that man then introduced his name without being unable to hide his atmosphere of "The me right now, is totally sparkling!"



"This head of apostle, has been definitely received by this dark hunter demon of the wriggling darkness, Karmvantis Elfalight Rowderia Hauria."



Correct, it was Karm. It was only the clan head of rabbit race Karm Hauria.



At the surrounding, the apostles who were held back desperately by the knights were approached stealthily from behind, then their head flew away with a splat by the many people of Hauria clan.



The rabbit ears of the man caressed the kodachi lovingly while he directed a pitying gaze at the collapsing headless apostles.



"My bad. But tonight Julia is feeling quite hungry."



A rabbit-eared woman was covering one of her eyes with her hand while whispering.



"Don't you know that you are the bad one? After all, you are making my other self to awaken…"



A rabbit-eared girl in the first half of her teens was staring to empty air with a philosophical gaze.



"…This is, the will of the world. Then, I can only obey that…"



A rabbit-eared youth about the same age was holding his left arm while groaning.



"Kuh, raging as you please again-! Calm down, my left arm-!"



A beat.



The rabbit-eared people wearing sunglasses and black clothing looked at each other face and then they nodded at each other with really satisfied expression.



And then, the apostles returned to their senses suddenly with a 'hah' and the moment they were going to assault the rabbit-eared people, with a superb timing as though the apostles' breathing was completely read through the rabbit people's figure and presence suddenly vanished and they slipped between the knights.



A strange air flowed in the battlefield.



"U, UoOOOOOOOOOO!!"



David slashed at another apostle as though nothing had happened at all. It appeared that he had become a man that was quite able to read the mood. Surely he discerned that he must not get involved with that lot.



The apostles were also rushing toward the choir in order to obliterate them while putting up their guard somewhat. They would keep getting targeted even if they just stiffened in place, so although it wasn't with their whole force, but a number that was quite many compared to other places was heading toward the choir.



It appeared that at the sky it was already filled to the brim with apostles.



But, at that time,



{Flying is not permitted nano!}



A really cute voice of a little girl resounded, and then at the next moment, the apostles who were above the barrier protecting the choir were staggering with their balance crumbling like a bird whose wings were plucked, without any change the apostles were felled to the ground all over. With great care they were dropping at spot distanced from the barrier as though they were pulled there.



There, a figure of a golem with back armament that looked like parabola antenna deployed could be seen. It appeared the voice was resounding from the telepathy stone speaker version attached on that golem.



{Bel-chan, do your best!}



Listening to the young voice――Myuu's voice that resounded once more, Bel-chan who was also known as the living golem 'Belfegoor' waved his hand languidly while using the area gravity manipulation artifact "Gran Farensen' that he shouldered on his back which pulled at the flying apostles and dropped them down.



Beside 'Belfegoor' that dropped down several dozens of apostles altogether, a further six golems appeared.



And then, with some kind of mechanism, *BAANG!* a thunderous sound was raised and colorful blast flame rose behind them while the golems took a cool pose. Surely if the golems could yell then they would say this without a doubt.



――Great Sin Squadron Demon Ranger, has arriveeeeed!!



Like that.



The movement of the felled apostles stopped for a moment seeing that uselessly refined posing and the act that let them knew of wills that were unlike that of a golem.



There, a command from the golems' princess was handed down.



{Everyone, kill them all nano!}



The princess easily declared something terrifying with that lovely voice. It made the listener wanted to see the face of her parents. The gentle voice "My my, ufufu" of one of the parents that was standing at the side of the small commander was leaking out from the speaker.



But, regardless of the resounding soft voice, the starting attack of the Demon Ranger was really severe. Each of the seven rangers was displaying superb teamwork while defeating the apostles one after another.



"This is a good time. Let the puppet who can do nothing but looking down at people know what it means to fall. All Gran Farensen, activate!"



The moment Liliana's command resounded, the gravity generation devices placed on all over the battlefield activated all at once. As the result, the apostles who were at the position between the ground and five hundred meters high fell on the ground all at once. That scene was just like a pitiful bug whose wings were plucked. And then, the one waiting for them below were the soldiers of allied force with the preparedness for death. The heroes who shouldered the existential fate of mankind.



Great numbers of apostles were dropped on the ground, however, they didn't show anything unsightly like fainting after impacting the ground, they used their twin swords to blow away all the soldiers who came at them. Silver feathers that were scattered all over here and there, or possibly the silver flashes surged up and blown away the soldiers.



"…Even by dropping us to the ground, even if you harden your body using artifact, but in the first place you are all merely human. There is no way you can win against us. Hang down your head obediently and receive the judgment of god."



One of the soldiers got pierced on the stomach by a large sword and he vomited blood. But, even with a mouth smeared with blood and his ghastly condition, that soldier made a fearless smile on his lips.



And then,



"LIMIT BREAAAAAAKKK-"



"-"



Magic power in unthinkable amount welled up from the soldier's body from who knew where. And then, even with his stomach pierced, using the sword that he didn't let go even then, he cut off the right hand of the apostle that was holding the large sword which pierced him.



"-, why, that ability…now, even so it's only to this degree after all. Even with that rare ability you possess a single arm is――"



"But, a blind spot is definitely created yeah?"



Even the last attack that was unleashed by betting one's life using a skill that was the rare between the rare among mankind, stealing a single arm of an apostle was the limit. The apostle who was about to say that was interrupted by a voice that resounded from the direction of her lost right arm.



The apostle who couldn't swing her right arm immediately tried to drive away the owner of the voice using her silver wing, but faster than that the attack of that person――Hoelscher Empire's emperor Gahard D Hoelscher bisected the body of the apostle.



The apostle's body was split into two, but even so she didn't die instantly with her astonishing life force and directed her gaze at Gahard. And then her gaze turned into astonishment.



"That, radiance…"



That radiance was――the radiance of 'Limit Break'.



Gahard grinned fearlessly while grasping tightly a crimson orb the size of a small stone dangling from his neck.



"This is a battle where the existence of mankind is put into stake you know. It will be too lukewarm if we cannot break merely one or two limits isn't that right? Now then, I also just have gotten used with this normal limit break. The last limit breaker left behind by that monster, how about I show it to the underlings of the shitty god huh!"



While saying such thing, in front of the apostle whose eyes opened wide Gahard then,



"Limit Break(Supreme Break)–!!"



The magic power enveloping Gahard jumped up a magnitude higher. Like that he split the head of the apostle who at that time was trying to fire her last silver bombardment, at the same time,



"Informing all the heroes of allied force-!! Break your limit, and fight–!!!"



Immediately following, it resounded in the battlefield, that voice.



"Limit Break-!"



"Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!"



"Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!"



"Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!"



"Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!" "Limit Break-!"



The last strengthening plan that Hajime left behind. It was this.



――Humanity's whole force's limit break.



Other than the basic equipment that were the artifact armaments, the whole forces were also provided by one other thing. That was this necklace attached with a small crimson orb. This artifact made it possible for common soldiers whose body might break from it without taking a dose of cheatmate to activate 'Limit Break'.



――Grade style limit break artifact 'Last Zell'



Using it for the first time brought about Limit Break, and after waiting until the body got used to it so that the body wouldn't self-destructing from the radical strengthening, the artifact would bring about the derivative skill of Limit Break, 'Supreme Break' next. Of course it was a double edged sword that couldn't hold out for long, but in any case it would be the end of mankind if they didn't win this battle. If this was to be a battle without next time, then they would use up their soul until the very last drop.



Gahard who faced a new apostle readied his sword while throwing at them words that represented the heart of mankind.



"Don't you dare-, to look down on human-!"



The decisive battle between god's apostles and mankind――the second curtain of it was now raised.





Chapter 173




Mankind’s Struggle (Second Part)



The fortress, at the front area.



There the apostles who were dropped down to the ground using gravity generation device ‘Gran Farensen’ were opening a fierce battle that was worthy to be called as mortal combat against the soldiers of the empire.



“oOOOOOOOOO-“



One of the empire’s soldiers raised a war cry while rushing at an apostle.



The large sword of the apostle was elegantly swung while emitting silver light, with a slash the head of that empire soldier was lopped off. And then her returning sword lopped the head of the empire soldier at the opposite side. The soldier’s armor could defend against the disintegration ability for several hits before giving out, so the apostle was aiming at the part where there was no armor.



“Damn it-, they are just too strong-! Our side is already breaking the limit twice already here-“



“You monsters-! Just die already-“



The specs of the apostles were already dropped by sixty percent, furthermore their movements were obstructed, in addition their side was fully equipped with age of god class artifacts, despite so the number of their allies that got defeated when facing an apostle was still overwhelmingly a lot. That fact caused the soldiers of the empire to hurl out abusive language.



“FUNNURABAAAAAAAAAAAAAA-“ (TN: Some kind of war cry, Kurita from Eyeshield 21 often use this.)



At that time when the soldiers were unconsciously getting cold feet from the apostles’ fierce attack, an angry yell that for some reason made a chill rushed through their spine and their groin tightened resounded. And then at the next instant, a fist that was like rock was swung furiously and pierced the back of the head of an apostle, the fist then pushed toward the ground without stopping――and it punched through.



The one who appeared behind hanging over the apostle whose head was pulverized, was a giant of a man, his whole body was covered by the provided set of equipment and his appearance was no different from other soldiers. However, the soldiers didn’t even praise that man for defeating an apostle, instead for some reason they were drawing away.



“Araaaan? What’s wrong everyone, are you all taking distance from moiiiii?”



“Hiih, forgive me!”



Thick lips and beastly eyes were peeking out from the opening of the helm. The man possessed inhuman level of muscle that was obvious even across the armor. Braided hair sprung out from the top of the helmet, a lovely pink ribbon was attached at the tip of the hair. That man who was a little bit strange was wriggling around while winking at the soldiers with feminine tone. It really was unavoidable for the soldiers to take even more distance while saying “Forgive me” reflexively.



After all even an apostle who was about to charge exactly right now came to a stand still with a twitch…



“NUURYAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA-“



“DOOOSEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEE-“



Even more throaty war cries resounded. When they looked, similar with the giant in front of their eyes――the monster nesting in the clothing shop at Brook city the shop manager Crystabel, an army of giants whose body was wrapped in so much muscle to the degree that made any onlooker wanted to say ‘you guys don’t actually need armor ain’t it?’ which was further equipped with similar set of equipment like everybody else was rampaging violently there.



One giant was hugging an apostle from the front, and then without even any time to activate her disintegration ability the apostle was bear hugged until death, and then another giant moved to another apostle with an artistic pile driver that pulverized the head of the apostle.



What was terrifying was, the embraced apostle received *puchuuuu* a feverish kiss from the giant, it was unclear whether it was for taking the aposlte by surprise or merely because of his tastes. While the apostle who received pile driver, perhaps because it was an irregular technique but the hugging direction was reversed from the usual pile driver, so the face of the apostle became exactly buried into the crotch of the giant in the end.



“How insipid this iiisss”



“Playing with a doll cannot make me fired up at aaallll”



The two giants who defeated two apostles also wriggled around while saying out such impressions with a feminine tone. The expressions of the two apostles who had been defeated and stopped functioning looked strangely teary eyed…but surely that was just their imagination.



The bizarre squad that was formed as a commando unit――also known as the manly women squad. The women(?) snapped their neck around to look for their next prey, and when they had finished designating their respective prey, the apostles who were confronting other soldiers shivered simultaneously. And then their gaze swam around expressing their wariness, which caused several of them to be taken by surprise and defeated.



They obstructed the movement of the apostles with mere (sticky) gaze and even forced the apostles to stiffen for an instant. That bizarre great contribution was decreasing the number of the apostles with certainty and backed up their allies. It backed up the ally…supposedly.



While monsters of a different kind were rampaging violently in the battlefield, a fierce fighting was unfolding at a slightly distance place.



One of the empire’s soldier readied the rifle he was provided with and fired in full-auto from middle range, nailing down an apostle in place. It was a hybrid weapon with excessive firepower that wasn’t influenced by the specs of the user. As expected even an apostle would have to be fixed in place if she defended against the swarm of flashes using her large sword.



However, an apostle wouldn’t be finished just with that. As though giving a return gift, an atrocious bullet that wasn’t outdone even by the railgun flew out――it was a counterattack using silver feathers.



The empire soldiers surrounding the apostle were mowed down. There were also people who barely endured using their defensive equipment or sword, but the low-level soldiers had their exposed flesh gouged out with certainty and their lives expired there.



*gachin* That sound of the bullet running out resounded. The empire soldier who was checking the apostle in place using his shooting was trying to reload the magazine in panic then.



Not letting away that opening, the apostle was going to fire silver bombardment. Despair flashed on the face of the empire soldier.



At that time,



“ZEAAAAAAAAAAH!!”



A loud scream of spirit that was clearly drawing a line compared to common soldier gushed out.



A large sword swung down from a sword held overhead at the apostle who was going to fire a silver flash.



The apostle looked annoyed while she lifted her large sword to block that attack…



“――”



The large sword that was swung down bent like a whip and its trajectory changed due to the holder’s arm, the vertical swing was transformed into a horizontal slash that made the apostle gazed in astonishment. And then, even when the apostle tried to defend but her movement was obstructed by the crimson light coiling around her and her neck got lopped off with her eyes still wide open.



The man who finished off an apostle alone, was the emperor of the empire who was emitting off unbelievable aura of supremacy――Gahard D Hoelscher was showered in the blood of apostle while he turned at the soldiers who got cold feet from that apostle’s fierce attack and raised a loud voice that sounded like explosion.



“You bastaards, don’t get cold feet-. Roar up! Fight until you turn into waste! This battlefield is a legend! All of you bastards are the spinner of the new legend! Do you want to get laughed by the guys in the future huh-!”



This battle where the existential fate of the mankind was staked on――it was certainly a legend itself seen from the viewpoint of the future generation. They were all the actors on this grand stage that would be talked without end at the future.



The soldiers of the empire and the mercenaries that were overflowing with ambition got roused up by those words. Fierceness lit up in their eyes, they blazed up with the desire to carve their existence in history!



Gahard’s violent passion swept over the battlefield.



“Imagine it. Whose figure is standing behind you bastards!? If you bastard get defeated, then that guy will die next-! Can you permit that? You cannot right!? Then blaze up your killing intent! Whether they are an apostle or whatever, who the hell cares, devote yourself to destroy all the enemyyy!”



The soldiers of the kingdom and the adventurers looked back over their shoulder for a moment, right now, even in this moment their eyes were seething violently with killing intent toward the silver monsters wielding fierce might. For whose sake they were standing in this place. That was obvious. It was to protect their friend, their lover, their family! This was a battlefield, where defeat was unforgivable!



At that time, the apostles who were offended by Gahard’s existence fired silver flashes at him all at once.



“Shield-, form up!”



Gahard immediately reacted. Just with that command, the imperial soldiers who had gathered around Gahard unnoticed combined their large shield and became the defensive wall for Gahard. The silver flashes were temporarily blocked with the special large shields that were also of Hajime made.



“Attack-!”



Gahard’s command surged once more.



Different imperial guards that were standing by behind the large shields kneeled and fired their anti-material rifle from the gaps of the shields.



The apostles who had just fired their silver flash were countered by the flying flashes which gouged their body and made them tumbled down.



And then, the moment the silver flashes stopped coming, Gahard rushed toward another apostle and then using his ever-changing sword attack that warped like a whip from the natural stance he began an equal fight against an apostle.



“Follow his majesty-“



“Surround and kill them-. They are not an opponent we cannot win against!”



“Don’t let these dolls doing whatever they pleased more than this-“



With that as the trigger, the allied force’s fervor rose and they battled with the apostles using similar teamwork. The soldiers wouldn’t shrink away anymore no matter how many of them were killed, that mettle and resolve that believed they couldn’t be defeated was gradually excelling the specs of the apostles.



In a corner of the fortress.



There a man that had been closing his eyes from the battlefield all this time quietly opened his eyes. And then, with a powerful voice that while sounded solemn yet contained passion, he called at the commander Liliana.



“Princess Liliana.”



Just with those words, Liliana guessed what he wanted to say and judging that it was certainly the time she handed down the command.



“Yes, Adol-dono. Now that the battle is moving toward a land war, it would be extremely bad if we get sniped from above the gravity barrier. …Please show how the strength of the dragon race that rules over the sky will usurp the air superiority in front of all these people.”



“Fufu-, acknowledged.”



With solemn and powerful footsteps Adol went out to a terrace that continued toward the courtyard where they dragon race people were standing in a row. His brethren below him, roughly three hundred people were filled to the brim with fighting spirit and looked up straight toward their clan head Adol.



“The persecution of five hundred years ago. There is no way for us to forget that. All of you who survived that time and made an oath for the vindication of our honor, and also all of you who were born since then lamenting all the irrationality while living in hiding…no need for even a drop of mercy or reservation-! Roar following your rage! The sky is our territory! Make all of them know that! All dragon race…we are departing-!”



“ “ “ “ “OOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO!!!!” “ “ “ “



They all roared simultaneously.



That was the signal of the revolt of the proud race who had endured the rage and humiliation for five hundred years until now. All of the dragon race rolled upwind while flying to the sky at the same time.



The barrier of gravity was made undone with good timing by Liliana. The dragon race used that chance to rise to the sky, and then at the next instant they were all wrapped in light.



And then, the figures that appeared then were the flock of dragon that was the conqueror of the sky. They flapped their wings majestically and their pupils that split vertically glared at the puppets of god. The dragons emitted unbelievable pressure from their body alone. Right now, all of the dragons were fully equipped with Hajime’s artifact, turning up their majestic appearance even further.



Among those dragons, a majestic scarlet dragon that boasted a conspicuously huge body raised a roar along with an enormous pressure. Regardless of the distance of seven hundred meters that separated him from the ground, the rippling vibration of the air was also conveyed toward the allied force soldiers on the ground.



Right after that, it was as though the roar just now was the signal for the opening of the battle, three hundred dragons fired their breath attack simultaneously. The flashes that each had their own color based on the element of their forte rushed at the apostles who were dancing in the sky with a haughty face as though they owned the place.



The apostles wrapped their body with their silver wings and entered a defensive posture.



However, the breath of the dragon race bit and tore those defenses and exterminated the apostles.



{Hou, as expected from the spouse that Tio recognized. It’s astonishing for our strength to be raised up until this far.}



Adol raised a pleased voice seeing his breath that was displaying a might that was ten-odd times the usual. Adol and others who were equipped with similar equipment like the armed black dragons had their specs raised up by the sublimation magic that was enchanted into their armor. Naturally there was also the effect from the cheatmate and the limit break artifact ‘Last Zell’.



{Kuh, I won’t recognize him-! That kind of brat’s――}



An indigo blue dragon――Ristas made a voice that sounded vexed somehow. But, he held back his tongue after seeing an apostle who rapidly closed in on him in the middle of his speech swinging her large sword, yet that sword was splendidly blocked by the armor on his body and instead the apostle got blown away by the shockwave that was released by the armor.



Even though he wasn’t doing anything but the enemy got blown away. It felt like he got protected by Hajime that made his feeling to get really complicated.



{Then, you can just try to steal her. After all, that man too had said that he will accept anyone’s challenge.}



{Uguh}



There was no way he could do that. He could clearly imagine how he would be instantly killed the moment he challenged Hajime. The tone of Adol’s voice carried a tinge of teasing somewhere in it.



Ristas who was at disadvantage in this talk flapped his dragon wings and accelerated instantly to attack the apostles. It was like he was saying ‘I’m concentrating in defeating the apostles!’



The other dragon people were also smiling wryly at Ristas who was still young while beginning to wield their strength fully.



As expected from the ruler of the sky. With their jumped up specs and maneuverable midair battle, and also the blessing of the age of god artifacts, the competed against the apostles in more than even battle. The conflict where the air superiority was put on the line entered into a mortal combat where dragon roars and silver flashes mixed all over just like a presentation of a space war in science fiction movie that was worthy of being in legend.



The powerful roars of dragon resounded through the reddish black sky, the allied force that was on the ground raised their war-cry at that gallantness while their morale was rising.



In a corner of the battlefield――at the position nearby the choir, there was a group that was clearly making a great contribution which drew a line from other soldiers and sacred knights at the area.



“UOOOOOOOH!!”



Along with a war cry a man made a step that split the ground and charged an apostle with a body blow――Nagayama Juugo the let his fist that was like a rock fell on the face of the apostle before she could do something.



The special gauntlet artifact of Hajime transmitted impact into the internal and destroyed the inside. Whipped up flesh and blood flew out from the noble face of the apostle and dirtied Juugo’s cheek with blood splatter, but he only fixed back his stance in a calm state just like his taciturn appearance.



An apostle vertically slashed her large sword from overhead stance toward that Juugo behind him.



However, with a backstep Juugo slipped into the bosom of the opponent smoothly and like that he crashed the apostle on the ground with a splendid shoulder throw. The ground was smashed into a radial shape from the excessive might and formed a small crater. Juugo stepped on the neck of the apostle whose movement was obstructed for an instant from the impact and gave her the finishing blow.



Juugo finished off two apostles in the blink of eye. Although the apostles were weakened and he himself was superhumanized, but the way he was fighting was splendid that made it clear that he had constantly trained without negligence.



There, two additional apostles arrived that approached Juugo in a pincer attack.



But, at that moment,



“――Wind blowing from the bottom of the earth, dye the thing with life white――’White Majestic Breath’!!”



White smoke rode with the wind and rushed through the air like a snake, it whirled and became a protective wall around Juugo. The two apostles that approached Juugo were slightly entangled by the white smoke, yet they used their silver wings and blew them away while withdrawing for once.



“tsk, petrifaction.”



The spectacle of the body part that was touched by the white smoke petrifying creakingly from the tip made the apostles showing an expression that seemed to want to say ‘how impudent’ while they attempted to use magic power of disintegration to unmade the curse.



“I won’t let you.”



The caster that blew the white smoke of petrifaction――Nomura Kentaro waved a conductor stick artifact. Immediately the white smoke coiling around Juugo in protection parted into two trails and attacked the withdrawing two apostles.



The apostles judged that it would be dangerous for them to get hit with that in their current state where their magic resistance was lowered so they attempted to withdraw further, but unnoticed the ground swelled up and bound their legs and their attempts didn’t bear any fruit. The apostles pitched forward from the sudden restrain. That became a fatal opening.



At the next moment, the white smoke that Kentaro manipulated swallowed the two apostles whole.



What were left later were only two artistic sculptures that were completely made from stone.



Other than them, there were also Nakano Shinji and Saitou Yoshiki who had gotten back on their feet after Hiyama’s betrayal and Kondou’s death, they were unfolding a really great contribution with bloodcurdling look, while protecting the hole in their formation were Tamai Atsushi, Aikawa Noboru, Nimura Akito unfolding a fierce battle against the apostles without taking even a step back.



They were all perfectly supported from behind by Sonobe Yuuka, Sugawara Taeko, Miyazaki Nana, Tsuji Ayako, and Yoshino Mao.



The members of Ai-chan bodyguard squad were able to operate almost at the same level with Juugo’s party and Shinji and others who were already fighting at the front line since the very beginning were because since Hajime and others departed from the capital, they encouraged their heart thinking that at this rate they would be no good and so they performed extra hard training since then.



Other than them, there were also the other students whose heart had been completely broken, even though they were unable to go as far as fighting directly, but with their abilities that had been heightened they were launching support magic from the rear, performing healing magic, using rifle or magic to add in laying out barrage, and so on. They too were desperately backing up the other’s battle.



Every one of them had their broken heart to be lit up once more by Hajime’s speech at the devil king castle. If Hajime’s speech at that time were merely words, then the moment an apostle appeared before their eyes their heart would surely break again because it was only supported by paper thin words. However, everyone of them had seen Hajime.



He lost one of his arms and one of his eyes, what he had gone through even changed the color of his hair, he was in a tattered state and even his beloved lover was taken away. The wailing that he raised because of his lover’s disappearance was something that caused them to feel pain in their heart. Even so, at the end he stood back up and proclaimed that he would crush everything and take her lover back. That appearance of him at that time was too powerful, burning their soul that were smoke-stained all this time.



It wasn’t for the sake of the world or anything like that. It was merely a wish for returning home. A wish of not wanting to let their friend died. In order to grant just that much wish, they had to fight with everything they had leaving nothing to spare, finally they were convinced of that and they mustered their courage.



For the front line group, this support that they received came from a group who even though their heart was once smoke stained but they were still a group of cheat holder from another world.



As expected, even though the enemy was the apostles but with their specs lowered, taking on the classmate group who had been strengthened put them at disadvantage. Seeing the apostles being exterminated one after another, the allied force soldiers at the area raised their acclamation.



But, at that time, one of the apostles that broke through the front line rapidly approached one of the girl student.



“Hih!?”



The female student reflexively screamed.



But, at the next moment, the fear of death changed into shock.



The head of the apostle flew up with a plop, the body that lost its strength slid in vain beside the girl student.



Furthermore the apostles who were trying to surround the front line group had their necks reaped up in turn from the outside and their lives expired instantly. Regardless when they moved their gaze over there, other than the corpses of the headless apostles, there was nothing and no one there.



One of the apostles turned her gaze around at the surrounding with a grim gaze toward this obviously strange situation.



“Kuh, just where in the world the attack came fro-“



“Right in front of you here! Shithead!”



The apostle was startled that her murmur was replied right from the front and her gaze returned forward. In her eyes, the shadow of a kodachi being sucked toward her neck was reflected. And then that became the last view of that apostle.



Displaying a thorough covert action(thinness of shadow) that couldn’t be noticed even by apostles, this ghost crossed over from crowd to crowd and in an instant, it approached to reap the target’s head.



Cutting down the apostles who had the figure of a human female was a really great burden mentally. What became salvation was that all the apostles had the same appearances, their cold figure where no emotion could be felt made anyone that saw them felt that they were like a puppet.



Coupled with the miserableness of having a shadow so thin that made even the worst enemy to show expression of “Eh? He is actually there!?”, the young man with the vocation of ‘Assassin’――Endo Kousuke was earning kill point that was the highest among his classmates while half giving in to despair.



“As expected from you, Kousuke-! I don’t know where you are though!”



”Aawesome, Kousuke! Though I don’t know where you are!”



“Endo-kun do your beeest! Though I cannot see your figure doing your best!”



“Eh, ah, I see, Endo-kun is also fighting! Thanks for helping ‘kay!”



With a drop, something shining fell from Kousuke’s eyes. It appeared there was a rain falling down. If he said it was raining then it was raining.



There, “Ufufu” a voice that was slightly filled with bewitching tone resounded.



Kousuke who slipped inside a crowd peeking for an opening made by apostle felt something chilly in his spine before he turned his gaze over there. What he found there was a woman from rabbit race, she was giving a glance at Kousuke.



“You, your presence management is really skilled. Perhaps even I am no match against that.”



“He, ah, is that, so?”



The rabbit ear female smiled widely toward the perplexed Endo. Kousuke’s cheek unconsciously turned red from seeing that smile. In the first place, the rabbit race who was the greatest popularity as treasured slave in general had well-arranged face and figure. The female who was talking at Kousuke right now was also an amazing beauty.



Having such a beauty, added with her lovely rabbit ears on her head smiling at him, the virgin young man with the history of having no girlfriend was equal with his age had his heartbeat increasing without stopping. Although there was also the fact that he was feeling stimulation from being in a battlefield right now.



But, that violent throbbing in his chest that felt similar from heart fluttering was immediately supplanted by a cramping face.



“My name is Ranainferna Hauria of Rapid Shadow. I rushed like a gale, sneak up like a shadow, and presented a single lethal attack, one of the stealthy hand of Hauria race!”



“…I, is that so.”



“But, when I saw you, I became embarrassed to introduce myself with that nickname. That’s why, it’s vexing but I’ll hand over the nickname of ‘Rapid Shadow’ to you. Your name?”



“…Endo, Kousuke.”



Kousuke was unable to say that what was embarrassing was actually introducing one’s own nickname. If he was asked ‘do you like a beautiful Onee-san?’, then Kousuke’s answer was decided already.



“Then, from today you are ‘Rapid Shadow’…no, you have surpassed me so…you can introduce yourself as ‘Kousuke E Abyssgate of Rapid Fang Shadow Claw’ then! It’s vexing for me though!”



“No, that’s fi――”



“Well then, so that both of us won’t die, let’s reap the enemy’s neck with our all♪ See you! Kousuke E Abyssgate of Rapid Fang Shadow Claw!”



“…”



Kousuke already wanted very much to give a retort like ‘how can you say something like “let’s reap their neck♪” with such a lovely smile’ or ‘just where did this abyssgate something came from’, but the most shocking thing for Kousuke was that Rana had discovered him when he already even used his skill to kill his presence. She had discovered him.



And then,



――Do you like beautiful Onee-san, with rabbit ears on their head?



“Kousuke E Abyssgate of Rapid Fang Shadow Claw, has arrived!”



It seemed that a love that budded in battlefield really existed.



The claw and fangs of Kousuke began to become even more well-executed, it was to the degree that anyone who knew him might suspect that he had received some kind of other strengthening. He went on to take the head of all the apostles. (TN: Here the writing of Kousuke’s name changed, from the normal kanji of Kousuke into the katakana of Kousuke E Abyssgate)



On the other hand, nearby such classmates there was one other person who was making a strikingly great contribution. It was Aiko.



At the rear, she kept glancing at ‘You Can Do It-, Agitator! Compilation of Lovely Speech Learned Case by Case’ that was handwritten by Hajime while in a certain interval she encouraged the allied force so that their moral wouldn’t plummet using words that the classmates felt like they had heard from somewhere. She was also raising her voice for the sake of her own battle.



“I command in the name of Hatayama Aiko! O transient life, stand up once more and destroy the enemy!”



Right after she said that, several of the apostles that should have been defeated already were standing up in a swaying motion. And then, they attacked the apostles who were supposed to be their ally with a force that looked as though they had recovered their original unrestrained spec.



That was the effect of Aiko’s soul magic. She reproduced a pseudo-soul from her own soul and manipulated it to possess the flesh of the apostles. This magic combined ‘Soul Reproduction’ that created a transient soul and ‘Necromancy’ of darkness magic.



Aiko whose vocation as ‘Farming Master’ was the only non-combat vocation among the classmates if Hajime was excluded, became aware of her own powerlessness, since Hajime departed on his journey she became strongly conscious of looking for a way of fighting for the sake of protecting her students.



There she thought hard of how to make use of the soul magic that was her only advantage, and the result that she reached was this magic. It was really ironic that what gave her the hint was the betrayer Eri’s necromancy and soul bind, the aspect where this magic was making use of corpses also caused a fierce conflict in her heart, still Aiko took the plunge in developing this magic.



That time at the sky above the God Mountain, she had already stopped staying at a clean place while only making her students dirtying their hand.



Besides,



“Until he return, we absolutely won’t lose-!”



Yes, for the sake of the man who she gave her heart to despite understanding that such relationship must not happen, she absolutely wouldn’t lose. Because she wanted to meet him, one more time.



“Ahahah, good grief Ai-chan, her motivation of hiding it already dropped to zero isn’t it?”



“If Ai-chan mentioned ‘he’, then there is also one person it can possibly be isn’t it.”



Sonobe Yuuka and Miyazaki Nana grinned a bit at each other while glancing at Aiko.



“Nagumo-kun is seriously a demon king. It should be impossible to even make one’s own teacher to fall for her student.”



“There are also several girls in class that look like they fell already…a real harem is formed right in front of our eyes, what a sight. Well, exactly because of that they can think of something like ‘me too’ though.”



“Normally just by looking at his relation with that child named Yue, anyone would draw back already. Like, when you see a girl that is too earnest toward a boy, you will give up then, something like that. I wonder if this is also the attraction of the demon king. We too have to be careful, if not we are going to get charmed inadvertently too.”



“Isn’t that righttt”



This time the two of them smiled wryly. And then, they looked up to the sky together.



There, they could see the figure of their female classmate who had earned the most kill point in this battlefield. She rushed through the sky freely, using two large swords, or black silver flash, or black silver feathers, or magic, she used them all depending on the situation to overwhelm the apostles.



Four jet black wings mixed with silver radiance spread on her back and dress armor with black tone covering her body. Her hair that was fluttering from the caressing of wind was also black. That figure with an appearance that was worthy as a fallen angel which was slaughtering the apostles who looked like angel, no matter how anyone looked at it that person should be called as a general of a demon king.



Despite so, the angel side was the force that was trying to devastate the mankind, and the fallen angel one was the force trying to protect the mankind, it was really an ironic story.



That rampaging fallen angel which was Kaori was clad in silver black light while moving with a speed that left afterimages trailing behind, right now she was cutting down one more apostle.



Two apostles who aimed at that moment swung their large sword horizontally. Kaori blocked those using her twin large swords and black silver wings and then she rotated with fierce momentum. Immediately the two apostles were repelled away and their lives came to an end when black silver feathers pierced their forehead without delay.



Just how many apostles had she slaughtered with the addition of those two Kaori wondered.



“There is no end to this…”



Kaori complained like that unconsciously.



“Then, give up and fall.”



The one who replied was an apostle. When Kaori noticed, she was completely surrounded in a sphere shape, she was literally buried from all directions without any opening left.



And then, at the next moment silver flashes were fired. The apostles ignored the possibility of friendly fire against their compatriots in front of them and fired simultaneously without any reservation or mercy, they all aimed at the center of the formed sphere encirclement and fired.



However, Kaori was unshaken.



“I don’t know any words like giving up you know?”



Kaori made such frivolous talk before attempted to make a breakthrough from the front in a straight line. She used her twin swords as a shield and charged to the torrent of light.



The apostle whose gaze met Kaori’s was convinced that Kaori would break through and she readied her twin large swords.



Right after that, Kaori whose whole body was smoking came through, regardless of her state the glint of her eyes didn’t weaken even by a little bit and she approached the apostle rapidly with fierce momentum. And then, she shot out black silver feathers, aiming accurately at spots like shoulder or ankle in a dirty method.



Similarly the apostle fired her silver feathers in the attempt to offset the attack. However at that moment chain of light stretched out from below her feet and constricted the apostle’s movement for an instant.



The restrain was immediately disintegrated and dispersed, but that was enough. The black silver feathers caught the body of the apostle and broke her posture greatly. Kaori arrived at that timing. She drew back the large sword on her hand to the limit, and in an instant, she dealt a stab in god speed.



*gi gi gi* The sound of fellow large swords scraping at each other resounded, but in the end Kaori also had the momentum of her charge which the apostle was unable to neutralize, like that she was then skewered by Kaori’s large sword.



But, it seemed that it was still within the apostle’s expectation. The handle of the skewered sword――the hand of Kaori that grasped there was gripped tightly and the apostle restricted Kaori’s movement.



There silver feathers rushed in.



The attack intended to bury the apostle together with Kaori.



“Even though she is your comrade but you all treat her too lightly.”



Kaori who whispered that while making an exasperated expression prioritized at giving the finishing blow to the apostle before her eyes without feeling concern against the rushing silver feathers.



The eyes of the apostle opened wide slightly.



Although currently their specs were limited, but their disintegration ability was still working in full. Because Kaori had the same flesh with the apostles she would be able to resist the disintegration if she activated the same ability, but even so she would still be overwhelmed by the amount of attack and bore damage to the degree that couldn’t be ignored. Kaori herself should also understand that. Despite so, just why…that was what the apostle pondered.



Right after that, the body of the apostle was bisected by Kaori’s sword, almost at the same time Kaori was swallowed by many silver feathers.



“She is supposedly able to trace our experience but…after all she is just an imitation in the first place. What a foolish act.”



“That’s not actually true.”



The words that one of the apostles who fired the silver feathers whispered were immediately replied to.



The eyes of the apostle narrowed quietly from hearing that voice which didn’t sound uneasy or agitated at all.



Ahead of the apostle gaze, she could see the figure of a wounded Kaori at the spot where the silver feathers were fired at.



As expected, she could be damaged but she was merely putting up a brave front. The apostle who made that judgment deployed innumerable silver feathers to deal the finishing blow wordlessly. The other apostles were also deploying their feathers at the same time, so Kaori who was at the center of the attacks looked like she was drowning in a sea of stars.



But, just before those silver feathers could be fired the apostles reflexively stopped their movement completely.



The reason was because the wounds of Kaori were healed in the blink of eye before their gaze. With speed and vividness that resembled Yue’s ‘Automatic Regeneration’, even the wounds that were pierced by a silver feather or the gaping open hole returned to their former unblemished state, not only that even her clothing returned to as good as new.



The apostles couldn’t see her using magic. Apostle body also wasn’t provided with a function of automatic regeneration.



The bewildered apostles gazed fixedly at Kaori――and they noticed, behind the forelock that was swept by the wind, on Kaori’s forehead, there was a cross crest shining silver black that was carved there.



“That is…”



“’Holy Crest of the Fallen’――this is my magic. I used this before the opening of the battle. It’s not as great as Yue’s regeneration, however even if I’m wounded it will activate by itself and heal me, really a convenient magic.”



Metamorphosis and regeneration composite magic ‘Holy Crest of the Fallen’――by carving a cross that shouldered the role of a magic circle on a part of the body, this magic would activate regeneration magic in a prescribed time. This magic could even be called as a powerful version of auto-regen. Furthermore, by using metamorphosis magic the holy crest that was like a tattoo could be erased.



“…However, if we continue to fire saturation attack, sooner or later the damage should surpass the healing. Your magic power is also not unlimited.”



Hearing Kaori’s words, an apostle intentionally said out words to pull herself together. It was unclear whether the apostle was trying to persuade herself with those words or if she was seriously thinking so…



Kaori made a fearless smile. It was a provocative smile that was something Kaori from before would never make by any means. The influence that she received from a demon king somewhere or his wife was keenly conveyed through that action.



“You have two misunderstandings there.”



“…What?”



Kaori’s atmosphere made the apostle asked back with her greatest possible vigilance.



Toward such apostle, Kaori prepared her twin swords and spread her two pairs of wings widely while leaking out her words in a small volume.



“First――”



“――!?”



At the next moment, Kaori’s figure vanished and appeared right behind the apostle. She was in the stance of swinging out her sword.



“If I will it, then I am able to avoid any kind of saturation attack.”



“To, too, fast――”



While the other apostles surrounding them were bewildered, the apostle who Kaori conversed with until just now was gazing in astonishment with half her body sliding down diagonally and blood spraying everywhere.



Kaori swept her large sword to shake off the clotted blood, the apostles who witnessed that returned to their senses and fired simultaneously.



But,



“――’God Speed’.”



Kaori’s figure had already gone by the time they fired, at the next instant two apostles were bisected and fell toward the ground.



Even when the apostles moved their gaze to that spot in shock, just as expected Kaori’s figure was already gone by the time they looked, and another apostle at a different place was bisected again.



“Spa, space teleportation?”



One apostle raised a questioning voice. But, right after that, she felt the wind gently stroking her body and a diagonal split appeared in her field of vision. Like that her consciousness fell into darkness then.



“No way that’s true. I am not in possession of space magic just so you know. This is merely me moving at high speed.”



“Nonsense-. Something like a speed that we cannot detect is just-“



“I can produce such speed. More accurately I am merely shortening the time though?”



Saying that, the apostle who talked with a shrill voice from shock was instantly cut apart by Kaori.



Regeneration magic ‘God Speed’――a magic that shortened the time affecting every single event. If the time for an attack to reach an opponent was shortened then it would become a god speed attack, if the time for traveling was shortened then it would be possible to move with a speed that could be mistaken as teleportation.



If the root of regeneration magic was traced back then it was a magic that interfered with time. It was merely that the usefulness of this magic stopped at ‘regeneration’ as the limit if used on the human body. Since Kaori obtained this magic from Meljine, she had trained in it all this time until now. It was the first age of god magic that she obtained and something that fitted her perfectly who had the role as healer, so her attachment to this magic was also especially all the more.



As the result, just like her success in creating the hour crystal, Kaori also became able to directly interfere with time although within a limit, her possession of the body of an apostle was also a factor in her mastery of this magic.



Of course there was also demerit, this magic consumed a vast amount of magic power for every single use. That was the reason why Kaori didn’t immediately use it right after the battle started…



Seeing her brethren got exterminated one after another by an overwhelming speed that they were powerless to do anything against, an apostle changed the aim of her argument. Perhaps it was also her scheme to make Kaori got agitated even just by a little.



“Indeed, you are strong. As to be expected from someone who serves that irregular. However, a war is not something that can be influenced by an individual.”



“What do you want to say?”



“Look at the surface. Even while you are facing all of us, the people are dying continuously. It seems there are also places that are putting a good fight, but in the end they are humans after all. They cannot avoid the accumulation of fatigue and damage. Before long they too will be reduced into mere corpses.”



“…”



“We are still arriving here from the Holy Precincts you know? There is nothing that you can protect. Everything, is just a pointless struggle.”



Kaori stopped moving and looked back at the talking apostle quietly. And then, she gently smiled at the apostle who was pointing the point of her sword at her while proclaiming mankind’s death and opened her mouth.



“Your second misunderstanding. Something like the amount of damage, or something like the amount of magic power…just who are you saying that to?”



“What are…”



“Even if my body has changed, I am ‘Shirasaki Kaori’. I possess the vocation ‘Healing Master’, and I am the ‘healer’ of the demon king(Hajime-kun)’s party you know?”



Saying that, Kaori held her large sword in reverse grip and pointed the tip to the surface. That sword which had been added with improvement by Hajime so that Kaori could go all out in exhibiting her ability as ‘Healing Master’ shined brilliantly in black silver color.



And then,



“――’Mighty Breath of Heaven Turning’.”



Right after that, a single black silver drop fell toward the ground from the tip of the large sword.



That drop when it reached the height of several meters from the ground, it went *KA-!* with light exploding from it that spread a ripple of black silver through the whole battlefield. Two layers, three layers, the black silver waves surged above the allied force.



Then, at the next moment a soldier of the allied force that should have died already opened his eyes with a snap. And then he raised his body with a bewildered look and touched all over his chest that should have been slashed open, when he realized there was no injury there he tilted his head further.



There were also others, people who were gouged out by silver feathers or killed by elemental magic woke up one after another. And then when they understood that their body was somehow alive with their wound healed, they immediately stood up and rushed forward in order to assist their comrades who were fighting the apostles.



Not only the people who had died, naturally even the people who were still alive but got wounded were also healed in the blink of eye.



“Wha-, they are revived-!?”



From above, the apostle who confirmed that situation exposed her shock as though the claim of the apostles that they were emotionless was just a lie.



Soul and regeneration composite magic ‘Mighty Breath of Heaven Turning’――this magic picked out which were the allies using soul magic and carried out convergence-fixing-attachment of the souls that were in the process of dispersing, moreover it performed healing using regeneration magic. As expected, in the case where the corpse didn’t maintain their original shape like being bisected until the body become in pieces or the head was gone, or the time of death had gone past ten minutes, the effect of this magic wouldn’t work on the corpse that was in those states, but other than those cases all the allies inside the radius of four kilometers with the black silver drop as the center would have revival and healing performed on them by this army use recovery magic.



Even with just those properties, this magic was already like a joke. However, the show of Kaori’s true ability didn’t stop just there.



“――’Divine Binding of Layered Usurpation’.”



Different from the large sword that was held in reverse grip its tip pointing below, the other large sword was held in front of Kaori’s chest with its tip pointed straight above. And then, along with that proclamation, the readied large sword became clad in silver black radiance.



It was like a black hole that swallowed the galaxy, and it exhibited a result that didn’t contradict that appearance.



“ts, this is, my strength is leaving-“



Even though they were already had their specs shaved off by the choir right now, but right now when they felt that their strength was shaved off even further the apostles showed their agitation.



Looking carefully, radiant lights were leaking out from all the apostles in the range of several hundred meters around Kaori, and then those lights converged toward the large sword Kaori held like a meteor shower.



And then, right after the lights were absorbed by the large sword, magic power was overflowing from Kaori’s body. Not only her consumed magic power recovered, it even looked that the magic power she possessed grew a lot more. Not only that, through the tip of the large sword facing the ground, a silver black drop fell to the ground once more.



Silver black ripples were spreading below once more like before. And the result, the movement of the allied force soldiers was obviously becoming better. The sharpness and power of their movement, and also their reaction speed were increasing.



“I just stole the strength of all of you.”



“Such thing…”



“It’s possible as you can see. I am a healing master. Transferring magic power to other people is also our role. Though it takes a bit of time to seize the magic power of you all.”



Saying that was easy but to actually do it was another matter altogether.



Soul and light element composite magic ‘Divine Binding of Layered Usurpation’――this composite magic designated its target using soul magic, and then it used sublimation magic to light element magic ‘Divine Transfer’ in order to transfer magic power to other people. It plundered the magic power of the seized opponent forcefully to recover one’s own magic power, and then that magic could also be reused for things like ally’s strengthening and so on.



Of course, normally even using sublimation magic stealing magic power from apostle without even touching them was impossible. What was helping Kaori in using this magic was the twin large swords her hands were holding.



――Demon Sword of Circle Calamity Anima Erunte



――Holy Sword of Gospel Bel Rexion



The demon sword plundered the power of the opponent and turned it into its food, while the holy sword made that power into unlimited power to share with the ally. These two swords exhibited their maximum strength when they were used together, a demon sword and a holy sword that exclusively assisted Kaori in her use of ’Mighty Breath of Heaven Turning’ and ‘Divine Binding of Layered Usurpation’.



“…Even so, even so, all of you cannot win. We the apostles are infinite. No matter how many little tricks you all play, no matter how much you all struggle, in the end only the destiny of ruin awaits you all. Because that is the great will of the god.”



“Human won’t perish. Surely it will be the same result no matter what kind of world it is. Just like how a boy without any considerable strength crawled up from the bottom of the abyss by himself, even when human is swallowed by difficulty, they will surely find out their path to survival. You see, human just doesn’t know how to perish. As long as there is just one person who wishes to live, wishing to protect someone, their determination will force something like a mere ‘destiny’ to yield.”



The gaze of the apostle and Kaori crossed.



“…Then, please show me the proof of that.”



With those words as the signal, the fierce battle was restarted once more.



The apostles attacked Kaori in a group, and Kaori exterminated them who attacked her.



If she saw the allied force became exhausted she would heal them, in a certain interval she would perform revival. When her magic power decreased she would steal from the apostles, sometimes she would carry out support bombing toward the surface.



At the other places too, the dragon race people were holding back the apostles with fierce efforts, on the surface too every single person were continuing to fight to the death.



It was unclear just how much time had passed.



Even the shadow of the sun had already gone from the reddish black world, the people was gradually losing their sensation of time. If they didn’t have Kaori’s healing magic, perhaps the allied force would collapse already since a long time ago. That was just how endless the force of the apostle was.



Even so the allied force soldiers believed that Hajime, the ‘Sword of Goddess’ who stepped into the Holy Precincts would bring an end to this for them, with that belief they mustered their willpower. There was already a lot of soldiers who met their end because the revival didn’t make it in time.



Gradually the sensation of being pushed back by the violence of number began to rule over the allied force.



But, at that time, suddenly one soldier who looked up at the sky above God Mountain whispered with small volume.



“Oi, what the hell is that…”



Ahead of that soldier’s gaze, there was the scene of the miasma reaching toward the surface with an obviously growing momentum.



Right after that, the muddy miasma overflowing from the crack of space increased in force all of a sudden.



And then, the miasma fell and covered all over the surface of the collapsed God Mountain, without stopping the miasma flowed and headed toward the fortress. Ahead of the miasma there was the capital, it passed through and touched the grass plain in front of the fortress. Just like the dust cloud that was produced when God Mountain crumbled, the black miasma approached them with a terrific force like an avalanche.



Reddish black lights were materialized in succession inside that miasma. Right after that, a great number of roar rose and countless monsters leaped out from inside the miasma. It seemed that it was the second wave of the monster army.



Furthermore, several thousand apostles also flew out all at once from the crack in space.



“Oi oi, a battle force augmentation after this far. Bring it on…this is a time to say something like that but…this is really bad huh.”



With a body that was dyed bright red from the blood spurt of the enemy, Gahard’s expression turned like someone who just had bitten a bitter bug. Not to mention the other soldiers, their expression were turning into despair.



Even though it was already absolutely the limit facing the apostles who were assaulting them without any pause, but after this long, tens of thousands of monsters swarm and several thousands of apostles were coming again――perhaps this deadlocked state would crumble for the worse like this.



“First and second division, concentrate at the front! Don’t let the monsters ride the momentum and charge into melee battle-! Stop them in place-!”



A formation was immediately formed by Gahard’s command.



The earthquake was spreading, the air was rumbling. The sound of the monsters charge and the roars’ shockwave were getting closer.



Looking at the overflowing large swarm of monsters while taking along an avalanche of enormous miasma behind them, damp sweating was flowing all over Gahard’s body. The dragons and Kaori were also held back in place by the similarly overflowing apostles. The cheat group from another world was also having their hands full with protecting the choir squad.



The distance was approximately one kilometer.



The expressions of the allied force soldiers were convulsing from the excessive pressure.



Perhaps this is hopeless. Unintentionally anyone was giving off that atmosphere. It was at that moment,



“――’Kalpa of Destruction’.”



The ground vanished. Along with the monsters.



“――’Kalpa of Destruction’――’Kalpa of Destruction’.”



A voice of a woman resounded thrice. That voice resounded with clarity even at the battlefield which was filled to the brim with noises.



But, rather than that voice, Gahard and others were shocked even more by the spectacle happening before their eyes.



The leading pack of the advancing monsters was completely vanishing into the bottom of the earth altogether. They were unable to even raise the scream of death agony.



Right after that, the voice that excessively reverberated and excessively irritated the listeners, the cause of this phenomenon showed her appearance sluggishly from a gate that opened at the plain in front of the allied force.



“Yahoooo☆ Appearing when the situation is in a pinch, the world idol, Miledy-chan has arrived-! Ahahaaa, isn’t this the greatest timiiing! Just-as-ex-pec-ted, me♪ A woman that can read the mood! Everyone of the allianceee, falling in love with me is-no-good-y’know♡”



What appeared was a giant golem, and a really tiny humanoid wearing a smiley mask, clad in a milky white robe riding on its shoulder. Miledy’s appearance that looked like she was screwing around a lot was taking a pose that felt like ‘Kyarurun☆’ toward the allied force army from the giant golem’s shoulder while making ‘tehehe-pero’ expression. The smiley face mask was somehow looking like that by some unknown mechanism. (TN: Tehehe pero. Imagine winking while chuckling tehehe and the person’s tongue sticking out.)



Including Gahard’s, the time of the allied force army was stopped.



Everyone without exception was having a genuine confusion of “Just what in the world is that” while at the same time their expression was turning into an indescribable irritation.



There an explanation came from Liliana toward the allied force. According to her, this person was a helper that Hajime and others called for, putting aside her annoying speech and conduct, this person was really quite useful. It was unknown what she had been doing until now, but she finally arrived right now, something like that.



“Geeezzz, everyone, what a tough crowd all of youuuuu. ‘Perhaps this is hopeless’…you all seemed to act pointlessly serious like that so I tried to enliven this placeee. Yet now you all are making Miledy-chan’s good will to go to wasteee, hmph hmph, Miledy-chan is extremely angry here!”



The irritation gauge of Gahard and everyone else almost exploded with that.



But, even while acting screwing off like that, Miledy pointed one of her hands at the approaching miasma behind and said a word.



“――’Severance Catastrophe’.”



The star of catastrophe created above the miasma immediately began to swallow the miasma with outrageous force. There was also the figures of monsters that were mixed inside the miasma there.



“Geeez-, daring to be a nuisance of Miledy-chan is something uuuunforgivable! Punishment timeee. ――’Demolish Yoke’.”



The gap between her screwing around voice and her chanting voice was absurd.



A voice of absolute zero resounded only in that instant of chanting.



The result from that was different from before, the feet of the monsters left the ground all at once and they flew beyond the sky with a preposterous momentum. Gravity was the resultant force from gravitational pull and centrifugal force. Therefore, those who had their gravitational pull severed would be flown away to the beyond.



The ten of thousand monsters were curbstomped by a lone person while helpless to do anything. Even the monsters who escaped the range of the large scale magic were exterminated by the rushing giant golems and knight golems one after another before the monsters could reach the allied force.



The allied force didn’t know that this person was one of the ‘liberator’, but even so they greatly comprehended that this was a helper that Hajime relied on. That this person was similarly a monster class character.



The advance of the monster of the ground was managed by Miledy and her golems, and then the monsters who broke through that was somehow managed by the allied force, like that relieve was slightly spreading among the soldiers.



But, that relieve was immediately crumbling right after.



The apostles who overflowed from the crack in space before this gathered into a single cluster. Their number was approximately a thousand.



The thousand apostle that formed their ranks like a single spear completely ignored the attack of Kaori or the dragons and began to descend in a straight line.



Naturally, anti-air artillery was also fired from the surface, but even while the apostles were falling one after another like scattered flowers, they relied on their number and kept advancing without hesitation. …They were heading toward the choir.



“tsk, I won’t let you-!”



{All hands, stop that apostle swarm-!}



With desperate look Kaori and Adol exerted all their strength to crush the large spear made from apostles.



Several hundred apostles were blown away in their descend to the ground, but even so the swarm of apostles that completely became a single cluster couldn’t be broken up completely…



“No good-, run awaaay!”



Kaori who was unable to oppose that pressure raised a scream while getting blown away.



Right after that, the large spear of apostles was emitting silver radiance like a divine spear that was thrown by god while stabbing at the barrier of the choir squad.



And then, before the people in the area could do something about the divine spear, cracks were spreading on the barrier that was protecting the choir squad…finally, the barrier was completely pulverized along with a thunderous sound.



The powerless members of the choir squad were vainly scattered to death before that tremendous might.



At this moment, the wedge that bound the apostles was broken.



The apostles of god exerted their ability in full.



Bloody wind was sweeping over the battlefield. Here and there silver lights were bursting up, the allied force soldiers that were making their resistance in those areas were instantly turned into a lump of meat in an instant. Their heroic war cry was turning into a mere scream.



“This is only a stopgap measure but――’Demolish Yoke’.”



Miledy was maintaining the picture of hell behind her while exercising the magic that cut loose the target from gravity toward the battlefield. The targets were easy to understand. The conspicuous silver magic power. She was only selecting those as her target.



Right after that, the apostles were simultaneously blown away to the sky. They were spinning while pulled until the distance of a kilometer from the ground instantly.



But, for the apostles in the strengthened state who had recovered their specs, this magic was really nothing but a temporary measure against them. They immediately fixed their posture. There the apostles who turned into the divine spear gathered. They didn’t stop there. As though to invite despair for mankind, a great number of apostles were coming out further from the crack in space.



The reddish black sky was filled to the brim with apostles to the degree that they could be mistaken as stars in the sky. And then, the apostles of god, as though to declare that fighting bit by bit was troublesome already, it even seemed to say that right now they would forget all the humiliation of the apostles of god being killed, they would merely rely on the overwhelming violence of number and began to focus their silver magic power.



The protection by the great barrier was already gone. The anti-air artillery and sniping attacks were shooting down the apostles with certainty. The dragons and Kaori were also exterminating the apostles who weren’t moving because of their concentration in focusing their magic power and they were falling like flies from the sky.



However, the apostles didn’t pay them any heed. They abandoned their dignity, they didn’t give any care of the damage done to them, they were merely focusing a light of destruction for the sake of destroying the mankind. No matter how many of them were killed and killed, the apostles’ number were replenished one after another, their number that was focusing their magic power was just too many that the rate of the allied force annihilating the apostles couldn’t catch up.



Right now, if the silver sun was fired, the result wouldn’t end with merely tremendous damage toward the allied force. The result that arrived would be ‘the defeat of mankind’.



“I won’t let you, absolutely-!”



Kaori glared at the sky with a gaze filled with determination while lifting both her hands above. In anticipation of this situation, the crystals that were placed in certain places on this battlefield reacted to Kaori’s will. Those lights connected to each other with lines of light and formed a single enormous magic circle.



――Kaori’s exclusive use Large scale protection barrier stone ‘Shutzengel’



This artifact assisted the barrier magic of Kaori who wasn’t a barrier master to deploy a large-scale barrier that was even more powerful than the great barrier using an enormous magic circle that covered the whole battlefield.



“Perish.”



“――’Indomitable Holy Severance’–!!”



When the silver sun was fired, a super large scale protection wall covering the allied force was deployed at the same time.



The silver spear and the black silver barrier collided.



Thunderous roar.



Flash.



The world was filled with those two things.



“Guh, UuuUUUUUaAAAAAAAAAAAAA-!!”



Kaori’s scream burst out.



The impact felt like she was stopping a comet in its track, the pressure felt like it was crushing her. Her black silver wings were flickering, her altitude was gradually dropping.



The black silver barrier was Holy Severance that was enchanted with disintegration ability. Therefore it neutralized the apostles’ disintegration ability and changed the attack’s nature into mere bombardment. But, even so it was a full power bombardment formed from several thousand apostles, it caused cracks to form on Kaori’s barrier by pure might. Kaori was resisting that using regeneration magic that instantly restored the barrier.



Her magic power was flowing out from here in the blink of eye.



Kaori gritted her teeth while maintaining her altitude and the barrier desperately.



The apostles didn’t circle behind the barrier to attack from the rear, perhaps it was because of their minimum dignity as apostles of god, they were merely adding to the silver bombardment continuously to smash the resistance from the front.



{All hands, deploy barrier! Don’t let that girl shouldering this alone-!}



Adol’s angry voice roared. The dragons gathering behind Kaori laid out their barriers one after another to layer with Kaori’s.



“This should lighten up the burden more or less. ――’Calamity Sky’.”



Miledy’s gravity magic created gravity spheres around the part of the barrier that was directly impacted and weakened the bombardment by scattering its might.



Other than them the people on the surface that could use barrier magic――with Liliana and the classmates in the lead, all of them deployed their barrier and supported Kaori. The people who couldn’t use barrier magic were also desperately supporting Kaori by using another effect of ‘Shutzengel’, the effect of transferring the magic power of the soldiers to Kaori, in that way they were sending their magic power to help.



A few second passed, or perhaps it had been several minutes.



The world of thunderous roar and flash that felt like an eternity finally announced its end.



At the same time the barriers were also dispersing.



“Haa haa, we, endured…”



Kaori who had endured through the disintegration bombardment of several thousand apostles were breathing heavily.



Her complexion was obviously looking exhausted. The dragons at her surrounding were also the same. Liliana and others and also the allied force soldiers on the ground who had mustered their magic power were also in similar state. The expression of everyone was turning grim.



Even so they had pulled through. Thinking that Kaori was smiling while she was going to activate ’Divine Binding of Layered Usurpation’…



A silver sun was illuminating the world once more.



“We the apostles of god are infinite――hadn’t we said that?”



Not only their number, their magic power was also infinite. The glaring apostles were whispering so while creating a new silver sun.



Kaori’s magic power recovery wouldn’t make it in time.



She wouldn’t be able to endure if they were attacked one more time by that.



Not only Kaori, all people of the allied force who looked up at the sky also realized that.



Despair,



Resignation,



Were filling the heart of them all.



The silver sun was falling down from the sky. It was the end…everyone thought like that.



But…



Kaori quietly lifted both her hands with her breathing still ragged. Her strong gaze that didn’t show anything like even a spec of resignation was staring still at the light of direction directly, a fire was burning in her soul, she scraped up even the fragments of magic power still clinging somewhere inside her――



She didn’t abandon her will to fight.



She didn’t give up.



It was unclear just how many people among the soldiers of the allied force could see her figure. If they could see her, then surely they would shed their tears from that noble and beautiful appearance without any doubt. Just like Adol and others whose heart was stolen by seeing that gallant figure from right beside her.



“Even just a second longer is fine. We are going to survive!”



If they could only just survive a second longer, at that time, perhaps that person that she loved the most would bring the end to all of this.



No, surely he would end all of this.



She believed that.



That was why, even at the verge of death, even just for a fragment of a second she wouldn’t give up!



The whole world was dyed silver.



The barrier that she could deploy looked so frail like a toy.



But, for a second.



Without any doubt, the attack was stopped in that second.



At the next moment,



“…Fufu-, see, just as I thought!”



Kaori made an expression that was enchanted from affection and unequaled trust. Ahead of her gaze, there was the scene of the silver light dispersing with a puff and the swarm of apostles slumping powerlessly.



Right after that, like a marionette that had its controlling string cut, the apostles stared at nothing with lightless gaze and they were falling to the ground like flies.



{This is, no, wait, what in the world is that…don’t tell me, is that Holy Precincts?}



Even while feeling bewildered from seeing the falling apostles, Adol’s voice was caught from an even stranger situation.



Ahead of his gaze, there, space itself was shaking, the sky was in an abnormal state where various sceneries which were projected like video recording were appearing and disappearing. It was as though there were several different worlds at the sky above, the sky looked like it was going to crumble and fall off anytime now.



That situation was like the prelude of the world crumbling, furthermore the atmosphere was starting to rumble which spurred on that bad imagination even more.



“Hajime-kun, Yue, everyone…”



Kaori too felt deeply moved only for a brief time, her expression immediately changed into a worried one. Looking closer the crack of space was also trembling, it looked like that it might vanish anytime.



With her state that had run dry of magic power, Kaori flapped her silver black wings to head toward the trembling space while maintaining her consciousness that was going to sink into darkness even now.



There was a person who caught her shoulder tightly.



“Leave them to me. To the one loved by everyone through many months and years, this Miledy-chan, ‘kay☆”



Saying that, Miledy Raisen stopped Kaori with an extremely gentle voice that ran counter with her tone.





Chapter 174




All credit goes to the original author (Chuuni Suki), who has posted the raw data here:



Thanks for your continued support. If you like my writing style, check out my original works at , or just leave a comment.



Bakapervert translated this chapter. Bakapervert did the edits.



____________________________________



The Last Battle



Platinum light poured down.



The radiant pillar of light quietly stretched from empty space to the ground――toward a chalk white round pillar. And then, when the light touched the summit of the gigantic round pillar where seven or eight people could stand with room to spare, at the next moment it vanished completely without warning.



There was a shadow of a person kneeling on one knee after the light vanished. It went without saying that it was Hajime.



Hajime looked around with a dangerous gaze.



In that place, similar to the richly colored space where they arrived at right after entering Holy Precincts, there was a chalk white path that stretched straight deeper inside with the pillar where Hajime was standing as the starting point. However, the surrounding wasn't richly colored like the first space, but closed in a darkness that was like an abyss.



The chalk white path that was stretching in a straight line looked extremely visible. At the end of that chalk white path, it was connected with a stair that led to above.



(This is not a mineral huh…)



Hajime whispered a little in his heart while looking beneath him.



He used transmutation's derivative skill 'Mineral Appraisal' to investigate the chalk white path and didn't receive any reaction back. He also used his sensing skills at the surrounding darkness but there was no reaction.



(Well, there was only one path. There is no meaning in sparing some thought for the unknown or trap after this far.)



Hajime began to walk calmly in the quiet space that was too silent.



In the first place Hajime had no problem with doing something like erasing the sound of his footstep, but right now he was consciously not erasing his sound. Regardless not only Hajime's footstep, even the sound of his clothes rustling or the sound of his breathing couldn't be heard at all. It was as though the surrounding darkness was thoroughly absorbing all the sounds leaving none behind.



In that world without sound, Hajime stared straight ahead while advancing. He walked while thinking of her beloved who was waiting ahead. Fury toward his enemy and sorrow toward his beloved mixed inside his eyes, those eyes were filled with abyss exactly like the surrounding darkness.



Hajime's legs approached the stair. Looking up from below he could see the top of the stair being enveloped by faint light. Without pause, Hajime unhesitatingly threw his body into the light.



His field of vision was dyed white.



The space where he came out at was white everywhere. Whether above or below, or everything at the surrounding, as far as his eyes could see there was only pure white which made him unable to grasp any sense of distance. Despite the certain sensation that he felt by stepping on the ground, but when his gaze lowered there it became difficult to be aware of the ground's existence there. It felt like he would fall below without any end in sight.



"Welcome, to my domain, of its deepest area."



A voice called at Hajime who was looking around.



It was a lovely voice that sounded clear. The familiar voice of his beloved sounded pleasant in his ear like a flowing stream.



But, right now he felt something slightly cloudy in it. Surely it was because the will contained inside the voice was rotten the core, Hajime thought. A scowl was slightly appearing on his eyebrows.



At the same time, a veil of faint light shining behind him suddenly vanished. And then, the existence of Hajime who was clad in clothing that had black tone looked like a drop of ink that dripped on a pure white canvas.



Suddenly the space ahead of Hajime's gaze was swaying.



It was as though the curtain of the stage was raised, the swaying space was cleared and behind it, there was a tiered platform with a height that was nearly ten meters. And then, there was a young beautiful woman sitting on the throne installed at its peak.



Wavy hair of radiant golden threads, white and smooth exposed shoulders, voluminous twin hills peeking out from the largely opened chest part, long and slender beautiful leg stretching out from the slit of the dress. Despite being slender on the whole, the woman also strangely looked sensually fleshy. Her legs were crossed, and she was resting her chin on her hand at the throne with a faint smile on her lips, that appearance looked like the personification of the word 'bewitching'.



If an average man saw her, no, all human without any sex distinction would have their reasoning sent flying just by a fleeting glance sent by this woman, there was no doubt that they would then prostrate themselves before her with a tremendous emotion that was similar with faith. An overwhelming beauty to the degree that would make anyone unconditionally felt that was right there.



But, Hajime's face was still expressionless, he was staring straight at that beautiful woman――who for some reason had the appearance of adult Yue, he was only staring fixedly without any particular emotion that could be seen on his face.



Surely that was because in contrast with the beauty of that appearance, 'repulsiveness' and 'ugliness' could be felt from those eyes and smile that seemed to expose what were inside.



Whether the person himself was aware or not of that was unclear…Yue's body, Ehitorujue that took over that body was grinning broadly while his mouth was opening once more.



"What do you think? While I was seizing this body I was also trying to make it grow while I was at it. I can brag that the result is quite something I think? Hm?"



Ehitorujue said such thing with a tone that obviously sounded like he was enjoying this, to that Hajime was intentionally sighing deeply and shrugged lightly.



"It would be perfect, if only the filthiness inside not oozing out like this. Your score is minus a hundred. Everything is wasted just by you being the one inside there. This has already gone far past ugly. If you don't notice it yourself then how about I lend you a mirror?"



"Fufufu, what impudent talk. But, I understand you know? In your heart you are not as calm as your appearance. Your blood is boiling that your beloved lover is played around freely with like this right?"



"Isn't that obvious. What are you doing acting all wise like that? A warning from me. It's better for you to not open your mouth too much. After all the more you speak the more your lowliness get exposed."



It was a well executed poisonous tongue. During that exchange, Hajime's expression was still expressionless without change. That indifferent tone eloquently indicated that what he said wasn't sarcasm or anything but something that came from the bottom of his heart, which caused Ehitorujue's eyes to twitch in reaction.



And then, with a smiling face that was obviously a mask no matter who saw it he opened his mouth softly.



"I command in the name of Ehitorujue――'prostrate'."



The Divine Statement was spoken with extremely natural tone――it was the manifestation of god's will that made anyone obeyed without question. Once this 'foul play' caused Hajime to struggle on the ground desperately, and now hearing this once more Hajime staggered in place…



*DOPAN-!!*



"――"



And he responded with a shot.



The bullet was blocked by a barrier in front of Ehitorujue, a ripple was spreading in the air.



"…Divine Statement has no effect at all?"



"Just how many times you had used that in front of me huh. You think a petty magic trick like that will keep working forever?"



"…"



Ehitorujue's eyes narrowed toward Hajime who was pointing Donner's muzzle straight at him. But, his composure didn't crumble by any means, instead he held out his hand that wasn't supporting his cheek in an inviting gesture.



Immediately at the areas around Donner & Shuragen, 'Treasure Warehouse II', all the artifacts that Hajime carried, the spaces were warping like jelly. But the spaces immediately returned to their original shape with a snapping sound as though there was something that got repelled away.



"…I see. So you came here with countermeasures prepared."



"Rather, you thinking that I will come without doing that is the crazy one."



"Don't get cocky, irregular young boy. You really showed much arrogance just by defending against Divine Statement and Heaven Existence."



"It doesn't matter how you are looking at me, shitty bastard. I'll say it one more time, the words that I told you at that time."



"…"



With a click, Hajime fixed Donner's aim at the heart of Ehitorujue while declaring clearly and loudly.



"――I'm taking back Yue. I'll kill you. It will be the end with that."



The white space didn't absorb the sound. Rather it made the words echoed powerfully with dignity.



The expression of Ehitorujue that was bombarded with those words warped evilly, showing how he would enjoy trampling on that determination, during that his crossed leg went down and he lifted his resting cheek, before he suddenly stood up. And then, while glaring down from above with the throne behind him, an immense pressure began to leak out. Platinum magic power was painting over the white space.



"Very well. This will be the last entertainment in this world. Let's play for a little bit then."



Ehitorujue's body was gently floating up.



He lightly spread his hands while his abundant golden hair was undulating, the sleeve of his black dress flapped.



At the same time, the platinum magic power light converged rapidly with Ehitorujue at the center and it formed a shape on his back.



What appeared on Ehitorujue's back while shining brilliantly was three layers of ring halo. The size of those halos, with the floating Ehitorujue as the center the first halo had a diameter of around two meters while the third halo had a diameter of more than ten meters.



Countless light spheres were slowly being created from those halos. The number of those spheres really should be expressed as the number of the stars in the sky. But, in contrast with their splendor, the pressure emitted by those spheres was absurd. Every single one was obviously hiding a power that could easily destroy a human and could possibly change even the geography.



The figure of Ehitorujue with gigantic halos behind him, served by countless stars, and clad in platinum light, would make anyone comprehended, truly if anyone who didn't know of the ugliness inside saw him then he was indeed emitting divinity that was worthy to be revered as 'god'.



In respond Hajime was,



"No holding back. ――I'm going all out."



Resplendent crimson light burst up. A whirlwind of magic power that spiraled wildly flapped Hajime's black coat and wrapped his body in crimson color. Even in front of Ehitorujue's power, his one eye didn't show any sign of faltering, unnoticed it was shining with clear crimson like red spinel.



It was Limit Break's last derivative skill 'Supreme Break'. At this moment, Hajime's specs swelled up five times over in one go. Then he activated Sky Step's last derivative skill 'Light Speed' which reinforced his perception ability to a different magnitude.



At the same time, countless crosses were lining up midair behind Hajime. On the black fuselages that should be called as a color of darkness, a red pattern was carved, the total number of those crosses was seven hundred.



――New type versatile offensive drone Cross Velt



While being two sizes more compact than the crossbit until now, it was clad with sinister crimson light that made one felt a lump of ice sliding down their spine. Perhaps that spectacle should be called as the grave markers of the enemies slaughtered by the demon king.



'You too will be added to this funeral procession', the current Hajime who was wordlessly asserting that was emitting unprecedented rage and killing intent while being silent, he was emitting might that was truly worthy for a person who was trying to achieve godslaying.



Dazzling platinum halos and countless twinkling stars.



Violently wild crimson storm and dark funeral crosses.



The two sides resented and bemoaned each other while the space between them creaked, where they were about to swallow at each other.



Ehitorujue pushed out one of his hands with an elegance that looked as though it had been calculated thoroughly until his fingertips.



"Now, this is the beginning of the game. First――dance for me!"



Right after that, a lot of light stars rushed toward Hajime. And it wasn't something that simple, the great number of platinum lights from the halos behind Ehitorujue were flying out with a motion that was depicting geometrical pattern. The meteor shower of light would even make anyone watching to feel a certain kind of artistic quality from it. There were lights in a spherical shape, then there were also lights that drawn a curve like a blade, and also lights that were approaching while rotating like a boomerang.



"A dance invitation from you son of a bitch, I refuse. ――Full burst!"



Hajime snorted at Ehito's invitation and gave his order.



At the next moment, all the crosses pointed forward simultaneously and the seven hundred Cross Velt fired all at once. All of the bullets fired were electromagnetically accelerated, furthermore all of the bullet heads were a special bullet that released multi-stage shockwave concentrated to a single point――Burst Bullet.



The platinum meteor shower and the crimson bullets filled the space to the brim. That scene was just like a war in middle age, where both armies were yelling war cry just before they clashed. Those two armies that were even more atrocious than death god clashed and destroyed at each other right in the middle between their commanders. Thunderous roars and violent impacts, and flashes were surging out to the degree that one could be deluded to think that it was the birth of a star.



A great number of meteors were flying off, bullets clad in crimson were extinguished. The meteors and barrage of bullets were struggling for supremacy with their destructive power.



"Hou, so you can endure this. Then how about the next move. Don't you die so easily okay?"



Ehitorujue made a smile that displayed his joy, and then he waved his arm elegantly once. Then the brilliant radiance of the halos behind him intensified, right after that *zuzuzu* lights in humanoid form manifested. The silhouettes of person that were formed from light itself were also carrying two large swords made from light in their hand, giving them resemblance with the apostle.



"Their ability is at the same level with the apostle. However, amidst the illuminating attack of these halos, can you also deal with these attacking apostles of light that are moving independently in the end?"



Even while he was saying such thing, the apostles of light were created in large number. With Ehitorujue at the center and the halos behind him, the number of the apostles of light had already easily surpassed a hundred.



But, in front of such view that could be said as despairing, Hajime only snorted "hmph". And then, he spoke. The soul of language to summon his own army.



"Battle of resource is the domain of transmutation master. You are still using these old puppet dolls even at this stage, aren't you too behind the time? ――Come, 'Grim Reaper'."



Crimson magic power overflowed from the 'Treasure Warehouse II'. The magic power that swelled up together with an intense flash scattered everywhere like explosion wave, although only temporarily but the space that was full of platinum light was dyed with crimson. Like that, a beat later the flash settled and then,



"This is…a golem army, is it?"



Ahead of the murmuring Ehitorujue's gaze, a great number of monster swarm clad in crimson light could be seen. However, their body was formed from mineral that looked even harder than steel, behind their sharp fangs there was gun muzzle, while doors or missiles were attached on their back or stomach, their claws were vibrating in super speed where everything that they touched would be torn apart, the body of the golems were overflowing with bizarreness.



――Hajime's exclusive one man army Grim Reapers



Wolf shape, great eagle shape, spider shape, large turtle shape, large monkey shape, there was an abundant variation of the golems, it was an army of living golem. Their numbers easily surpassed a hundred, furthermore they were fully loaded with hybrid weapons inside their body. These were the massacring army of the demon king who knew no pain and no fatigue.



Ehitorujue whose corners of the lips were lifted up and Hajime whose eyes narrowed in absolute zero let their command resounded at the same time.



"Apostles of light, exterminate the unsightly monsters!"



"Death gods, tear apart the useless puppets."



Right after that, the light apostles flew out while shooting light beams, the metallic monsters roared while charging forward. The light apostles who were moving in high speed that trailed afterimages behind were surprisingly followed by the mechanical wolves who rushed through the air with rippling wave in their wake and afterimages similarly trailing behind. And then, the wolves deployed a small type gatling gun from their back and also firing a cannon from their widely opened mouth.



The large eagles that ignited their thrusters and climbed up in one go were trampling the battlefield by scattering cluster bombs like heavy rain from high above. The large turtles were letting loose large amount of missiles from their back, transforming into fixed batteries. The light apostles who approached near to aim at the turtles were blocked by the large monkeys who were forming a wall with the large shield they carried, and then the spiders charged through the gaps and carved apart the shell of the apostles using the sonic wave they generated.



Naturally there were also grim reapers that were done in by the light apostles, but each time a grim reaper got lethally damaged they would self-explode that swallowed the surrounding, even at a minimum they would bring their killer to accompany them in death.



"To rival my magic with amount of resources…it is really something unthinkable for a human. However, if it is said in reverse, even the specialty of the irregular can only rival me at bes――"



"Don't yap, you worthless god."



Hajime fired off Donner & Schlag, cutting off Ehitorujue who was speaking ridiculingly. There were two sounds of gunshot. But the flashes that cut through the air were six streaks.



Inside the clashing fierce storm of destruction, those bullets slipped through swimmingly and sniped the caster Ehitorujue.
